I love getting nice boxers for Christmas.
We weren't allowed to leave the table until we finished our dinner. People shouldn't be forced to finish all the food laid out for them on their plate, rather they should decide when their body feels content/full. There were so many days I would be stuck sitting at the table for literally hours just because I couldn't force feed myself the remaining food on my plate. 
Here's a cool example of  how many zombies there could be around say... The police station or some main buildings in cities (Taken from Dying Light) http://www.rise-mag.com/wp-content/uploads/2015/01/DyingLight.jpg
I saw Stan "the Man" Lee introduce Aerosmith and also Johnny Depp came out during the encore and played guitar, does this compare??
Eventually you have to replace everything. Beta fish are probably the easiest fist to keep. You dont need to do shit but feed them one or twice a week. 
What the fuck is this?  It's awesome. I love this stuff.  Thanks for the download. 
I'll battle in a second. Let me get a team together
Yup. It's gotta be saver availability, so if the US flights you're seeing are only available at higher redemption levels, it won't work
Sadly my VoC doesn't shoot full auto anymore at all because of the trigger button bug....same with the Last Word and Bad Juju now :(
lol downvotes !  actually I agree with the other poster go for a pentium and  an  as rock 81m or gigabyte similar motherboard  
Thanks! I prefer carrots to berries because they last longer.   If I play as Webber can I deal with the pig king (I know pig men don't lime me)?
This is what bothers me about my sister. She is certainly no narc, but she has no idea how to express her emotions and tends to blow up over stupid things.  Just today, her boyfriend threw away a drink she wasn't done with. A normal person would be upset, and quickly get over it. She was pissed for a good 20 minutes, even after we both offered her money/drinks, just because she wanted *that* drink. She would have continued being upset but I very sternly reminded her that she was ruining her own mood over a hot, flat soda. She's 17 years old. She also blamed her boyfriend for us going 30 miles in the wrong direction... Even though he had been telling her to turn around the entire time.  It's really encouraging to see that there's hope she might learn to harness her emotions healthily. I have no idea how to go about pointing out that she does this because she will take it as a personal attack and just deflect back to me with rage. My current plan is calmly taking each situation as it arises and feeling out whether it would be a good time to tell her she's overreacting.
This *is* the Puppet, correct?
When I hit a party with my pals, and a mindbogglingly hot chick walks in the door. Not because she wants to party. Not because she's looking to get laid or likes the music. She's there because her dad, my friend, had visitation that day. 
You are anything but smart.
Reynad [mentioned](http://www.reddit.com/r/hearthstone/comments/2u6kq4/the_meta_snapshot_4_magicamys_gvg_ladder_tier_list/co5lotx) there would be changes.
I have a chai and she's not so good in PvP.. especially if you're fighting  someone who can push you back and if you heal using chai the food she drops all  miss and you wouldn't get healed at all. Stats wise, she's decent imo.
Haha
Yes! Somebody liked the tips at the end. This is actually the first time we added those. Thanks for the feedback!
I understand. I just don't want to be 40 years down the line and afflicted with obvious tell-tale signs my grandchildren will notice. Maybe I'm being paranoid...
Actually, I am.  /r/atheism 
Australia &gt; Korea. 
If I had the money I would just buy it all &amp; commission more haha.
Was I supposed to ask before I bought it?
Read Theology of the Body, sweetheart.  Then you can take it up with St. John Paul II. 
I know. That was the joke. Ok, bad joke, forget it ;-)
True. Vaping can definitely reduce how high you get. At least, how intense it is. A good ol fashioned bong rip will mess me up and while I've been similarly gone from a vape, usually it isn't that intense. However, vaping can get me there and it uses material so much more efficiently. The is the best part to me. I get way more mileage out of vaping than I would any other way. If trees were cheaper, I'd probably be rolling joints the size of my head. Until that time comes, going to sip, not gulp.
Welcome to Bronze league
Christophertsao US 
Why would you want to stay with someone who demeans you like that?
'you know why I'm here'
just pre-gaming man
Before I got this phone I heard different reviews on Motorola phones stating that the dimple on the back of their phones is great, and not really getting it.   Now that I own a phone with said dimple I now know what they are talking about. That dimple is so perfectly placed. 
[You're probably right](http://www.kansascity.com/news/local/news-columns-blogs/the-buzz/article8079267.html)
The top comments in the video on youtube I feel are much worse
I feel like Jotaro would like Beat-em-ups more than RATED MATURE games.
http://imgur.com/IEZgnXf,vDWUbRw,QM61DfC,5jV06yq,Z5ZgzFK
If you're playing enough video games to be affected by two no-game days, you're playing entirely too much and have a problem.
Nu hvor vi er igang!  Jeg hedder Nicolaj, jeg er 19 år, pt. Går jeg hjemme på dagpenge #RichKid, i min fritid underviser jeg i Guitar, bas og klaver spil, udover det spiller jeg bas i et band. På min efterskole vandt vi en pris for skolens bedste band, hvilket gave et gavekort på 2.000 kroner til 4sound.. Ellers er jeg meget interesseret i biler!. ;) Peace!  - Navlefnuller08
apparently Flip Saunders is pissed about the video
"You know those words! That's impressive!"  Yeah, totally impressive for a 40-something year old man to know the chorus of one of the most popular songs of the 80's.
Thats what he gets for shipping my Raging bulls 5 epacket instead of ems -_- lmfao 
It's a lot simpler to "make everyone just switch" when "everyone" is like 15 bankers and a some nobles.
People calling characters toons
They're easily eastern European or Russian judging by the apparel, the van outside, and their facial structure. 
upvoted erinomainen hinta!
New account, created specifically for this post.  Not sure if troll or throwaway.  One thing's for sure though.  The neckbeard is strong with this one.
Hey rask!
I think she's kind of turning against proctor so that she can eventually take his place rather than still having feelings for hood, she probably wanted the best man to win. Just my opinion
Interesting post, nice work
Yeah, I’ve had that before. Not exactly lucid dreams, but they tend to be worryingly realistic and very often based on games. Like the one time I was just having a completely normal day in the Mass Effect universe.
One of the casters almost dropped an F-bomb when commenting about two disengage comps.   And those CLG strats!
There's this Dandy guy and he's a fgt Kappa
What is an inoculated anchor? 
Welcome to NA kid
Can I add you as well?
Everyone acting like they didn't watch Smash finals at Evo last year and didn't ask the exact same question when ol' Reggie Fils-Aime said the same stupid shit. 
Either that or general insufferableness... :)
Its got some wear.  There are rips on the back cover. The front cover has a fold near the top right corner.   But the cover is still attached.  If its a cgc 2 ill be happy
Sixers
&gt; There's a reason "the female of the species is more deadly than the male." Our fathers and grandfathers were taught Kipling's version of this in grade school, but it's been effectively banned as sexist since the 1990s.  I don't understand why a poem that illustrates an unromanticised truth about female nature would be banned in an educational system where the majority of teachers and even administrators are female.
&gt;(Also I feel that this new top 3 system is going to really take away attention from new authors but that for another thread and another time)  As it is, most people dont play the foundry at all. So anything that gets more people playing the foundry is a good thing. And once they realize there are great player made missions out there, then maybe they will want to look for more. 
Maybe she's afraid about the same thing as you (losing each other as friends). I wouldn't ask or tell other people in the group unless you're absolutely certain that it won't have impact on the situation. If you two are really that close than I should say this is something you talk about with her privately
24 and I started in high school. Not sure if I was 14 or 15.
love those pretzels
I did it one time to keep myself from starving to death. If they've got better gear, then it's easiest to catch them off guard.
Well it's also clear the cop handled it wrong and made things worse.
I cycle. For an hour of cycling I burn 800 calories easy. My male friend who used to go with me could burn over 1000. Lots of hills though. Cycling is a true shitlord sport.
It completely circumvents parental locks. Web access is locked down on a child account, but the account still able to pull up r/gonewild.  I suggest locking down the app for when no one is signed in. This is perfect as IE is required to log in anyway.
You would if it had your name and company on it.
How do we know it was an American pitbull terrier?
proxying the wave? wasn't this the strat that Chauster was talking about that CLG was trying to do on blue side during S2 worlds? except Hotshot couldn't roll for the life of him and rolled all purple side?
Those were a fan translation, this I believe is official
I learned that's where all the loyalists retreated to after the revolutionary war. That's it. Seriously.
This is always tricky at first but I generally quote a price that is an average of the Rights Managed pricing on getty images, corbis, and software called FotoQuote.  Fotoquote isn't likely something you have access to, but by pricing this stuff out on Getty or somewhere like it, you can get a guess as to the going rate for these sorts of things. You may need to ask them for more details as to their exact use, how many copies (if in print), what size (if on the web) etc etc.   Tricky the first time out for sure, but well worth it if you can turn it into a sale.  If they've told you they want it for free and it will be good exposure for you (it won't) you can still give them a quote - sometimes they'll negotiate or accept your offer.  They may also have a budget that you can work within to both of your satisfactions.  Good luck!
Sorry! I cannot find it, please reply to this comment within the next 5 minutes with your new pokemon's information to reserve your spot and prevent yourself from having to make a new comment!
My friend in michigan only has internet options up to 60GB/month. Damn monopolies in rural areas.
Were trying to be 1st loser though!
True, but I think that Boba's helmet is a good match with Kam/Beastmodes' dark visor.
1. Treek 2. HK 3. Ashara 4. Jeesa 5. Blizz  I just hate the rest any way so never use them just maxed them all out for the legacy :) Special hate going out to the ship droid :D
.... It was Halo 3, wasn't it.
You can add 2 IGNs to the Flair and this would be advised. \^-^
Yes I will I will provide video or picture whichever you prefer
In the netherlands it was in the top40 list for like 10 weeks straight..
*"Try to enjoy each moment, no matter how hard. And sometimes it's impossible and that's okay, because sometimes it's easy. And I do my best every day, and that's enough."*  Thank you for this, I wrote it down on a note card and put it in my wallet for the next time I have a semi-panic attack because of the pain. Its easy for me when I'm doing "great" to think back on the bad times to help motivate me but I'm still pretty bad at focusing on the good times/thoughts when my pain get above a 6. Thank you for this though, I hope/think focusing on the good times will help me keep my cool the next time my pain gets bad. Or at least it will help me remember that good times are on the way.  Haha I am seriously the exact same way. Before my car wreck I was kinda a jerk and had a hard time sympathizing with peoples struggles and was definitely a far right republican (I more just believed what my family did, but I definitely embarrassed it.)  After going through so much pain and suffering I know have some kind of reference point to compare others suffering to. Now I am pretty far left (Bernie Sanders is the closest politician to my beliefs if that says anything) big MMJ believer, and I'm just more aware of how my actions affect people. 
I'm in a one year Master's program, which is basically like a post-bac pre-med program. So this really fucks me and other who plan on taking the new exam this spring/summer. My understanding of the concepts are solid, I need practice taking the exam, that was my problem the firs time I took the MCAT. Thanks for your input.
"Oh, uh..."  *Ahmed hastily starts rushing around the kitchen, returning all the extra stuff he got.*  "Ah' didn't know! And er, I'm sorta' followin' you...only a bit."  *Ahmed replied insincerely, his sudden change of behavior couldn't make his fibbing any more obvious.*
There is a setting in Clover called inject System ID, look into provisioning that setting. Also, debug your sleep issues using "sudo pmset-g log"
Yeah those missions would be pretty frustrating if we actually did collect lost items for guardian.  
Well, duh.  Businesses have been leaving California for decades.
Thanks.  Unfortunately they're all out.  I've tried them before and just gave them a call.  I think it might be a lost cause and it might be time to learn how to putt with something else.
At least it's not Ubsoft 30 FPS^more^cinematic^my^ass
*She wraps an arm around him.*
May 26th!
Team meeting? Anyone say team meeting?! There was a team meeting... RIGHT!?!?
Joe Soto?
Tell him I said thanks
Still, the schematics for the tower may have been communicated to her by Mordremoth.
welp piglet and impact bout to flop day one 
Would you like to dance?  *He smiles.*
Well you know her had to give up some a lot of dough for that deal.
Yup. Lots of Lebanese immigrants out in south america. Also Japanese 
Lvl 32 titan maxed ghorn PSN: Risinex
Pleky don't take no shit 
king of dragon pass
#I'M A FIVE STAR MAN!
&gt;Until the sample of sentient species is expanded, we are still the best.  Which is an absolutely meaningless statement without a reference point(s). Though while we're on that logic, lets evaluate all the things we would also be the best at:  * Art * Music  * Literature/Storytelling * Building * Technology  * Peace * Being nice to each other * Charity * Self-loathing
DOT and his boss suspected it, and when confronted with it, he actually admitted it. 
[We're learning so much!] (http://i2.kym-cdn.com/photos/images/original/000/620/434/f9e.gif)
One of my childhood dog's canine teeth turned a grayish blue color after chewing on a bone.  The vet said that the tooth was damaged but as long as it wasn't giving her problems, leave it alone.  It never bothered her and she was 10 when it happened and passed away at 17.
Not sure if it's true but http://www.reddit.com/r/crackpack/comments/27avtn/help_with_mob_grinder/chzcasv
I've got to agree with this one, I feel that they were just made for the sake of it
I don't think that each person on the team has to have world class mechanics in order to contest at worlds. Rather than trying to shore up one of their weaknesses, I feel like they should play around their strengths more. Simply I believe that they should put more focus onto their jungler and adc, and have Hai simply play more passive. Hai's lack of world class mechanical skill comes back to bite them in the butt when he tries to make extremely aggressive plays. In most sports its been shown that at a certain point gathering of large amounts of talent will not always work if they lack the chemistry. C9 Have pretty good mechanical skill with sneaky, meteos, and Balls, and a support that does his job very well in lemonnation. I feel like if Hai can transition into simply doing his job like lemonnation does in support, and stop giving up random solo deaths due to stupid play (which happened alot at worlds and I felt like contributed more to their loss), they can contest. To be fair this is simply my opinion and I do realize that by replacing hai by a significant upgrade could work, it could also result in a large downgrade in one of their currrent strengths and only improve their weaknes by a little.
Yeah, doesn't work for me on Android.
Ok, so clarification he is not a coworker, he doesn't work in your group. He just works in your building. That's huge.  Cause normally I tell people don't ever date who you work with. You don't work with this guy, just a person in your building. Next time you see him, you walk right up to him and ask him how bout this weather, did you see that game, Can you recommend a great happy hour, anything under the sea including, hey mr.hotpants, I like think you are the bee's knees.  If you don't say anything, you always will regret it.   Life is scored on how many regrets you don't have.
What's the deal with SITE releasing every single beheading video? No other sources, just SITE. 
awesome. Thanks!
you can keep denying that hai is trash player all you want, it wont change the fact he is bad
*He kisses her back deeply and blushes as he touches her butt*  [Brb making dinner for mom's birthday] 
Yet his karma counts are 292934 for link and 337188 for comment lol
I'm all over this one:  Presenting Heal 2: Electric Boogaloo.  http://imgur.com/8U9Sge0
way too cold man. 
This sounds exactly how I like to waste my time :)  I am also buying rootstock this year from rain tree for my "real" trees. These are no doubt a massive gamble. I can in fact use these seedlings as scion, graft onto a mature tree and see in 2 years if they are any good. I believe this is how the old manor houses used to develop new varieties.  
No, I have bought their books and invested my time. I deserve an ending to the story. I guess you could argue that HxH had an ending because Gon meet his father, but there are some plot points he needs to address. As for GrrM, he has a lot of things to finish up.   If they can delay their works, then we as fans have the right to be angry. 
I repeat this to myself everytime my 19 month old throws a tantrum. So every few hours. 
I've done work as a digital QA manager, and the real scary thing is that any automated software testing suite could easily test every single MTG card interaction and could easily be configured and re-run every time a new set is released. Which makes me think that they don't have one or use one, which is simply appaling giving a program with the revenue of MTGO. 
HAWKS! 
Wait, your Lushen solo's Faimon Hard?
No probs, good luck!
Because it is just a stupid movie.
Think of any old Russian/Ukrainian song/poem/verse about war. They go like "каждый думал о своей любимой," not "о Путине" or "о врагах." A Russian soldier in Donbass isn't thinking about stealing Ukrainian land or whatever, he's thinking about making sure he and his comrades get home to their families and loved ones. Same for an Ukrainian in the Azov Battalion or similar.  The fact that this guy was worried about getting downvoted because he suggested that both sides are human is silly.
Fantastic progress!  
Dan Carlin's Hardcore History.   The man is a gifted storyteller who makes the history, stories, and events he focuses on come to life like no other. I would *highly* recommend starting his series on WWI.  It's fascinating. 
Why thanks you!
What year?  Looks like a 76 by the front end, I owned the 84 gmc pickup when I first started driving donkey years ago.  Still was one of my favourites to this day!
I think it's a recreation. I think the whole thing is sculptured around the designs of the originals. Also, you may want to flesh this post out because of Rule 4, blah blah blah. Autobot might get a bit pissy about the length of this. You're probably fine, but it might happen.
I have heard the popular songs off it since then like Blood on the Leaves and New Slaves and they still don't appeal to me but I will try to find a time to give it a full listen when I'm in the mood for it. 
Thank you and up vote for being in the PNW!
thank mr skeltal
They are now inside a clear thick plastic tubing! :) Thank you. 
&gt; Then you have a hilariously broad definition of totalitarianism. The government isn't "saying who is allowed to have how many children," the government is creating a tax incentive for people to not have as many children. The difference is pretty vast.  But it is saying that.  &gt; Procreation caps. We have a bad system now. Tax incentives for more children-- "create more consumers!" Gross. Population's real simple. Replace yourself before you die. That's it. You and a partner can have 2 kids. Hell, have 3 just in case. After that, your case needs to be reviewed. Is 4 kids financially viable for you? Or is it an irresponsible decision that puts a burden on society? At some point, we have to be fining people for having children, not giving them rewards.  This doesn't actually say that there will be tax incentives for people not to have as many children. It says that you 'can' have so many kids and after that your case needs to be reviewed; you will be penalised if the review is negative.  &gt; It is a pretty important choice, which is why precisely no one is arguing that the decision should be made for anyone by the government.  He's actually arguing exactly that, if you read the post.  &gt; TYL that providing sexual education for young women and protecting female reproductive rights do not directly affect men.  Forgot this bit?  &gt;  and influencing the country's birth rates  That would seem to include men. Certainly, from what the post actually proposes, men are included.  Edit: For extra clarity, most children (probably) are planned and men are usually involved in the planning. Any attempt to influence a country's birth rates would simply have to involve men, because most children's births were done with the agreement of the father. It'd be nonsense to try to appeal to married or de facto married women to control the birthrate separately from their husbands; it's a joined decision to have kids in most cases.  So if you care to argue what /u/Zizekesha actually proposed instead of building a strawman of his arguments that make them seem non-coercional, I'm right here and we can do that.
Hmmm...those videos weren't very good...not sure this is the greatest live performance I've seen from them...good for you though!
You are disgrace to our motherland.
Maya: "Oh? What's yours? I believe she said something about being organic, so she could....mess with her body or something."  *She finishes eating the chocolate.*
I'm over-thinking thus question. It can get annoying but can get me out of sticky situations
Very nice! Thank you for posting this here. :)
Booooo. Go Seahawks!
Their bandwagon fans are just as bad
Did you use that tilt-shift voodoo to make everything look like toys?
I was able to fap to this.
That's definitely a valid point, but I would argue that the examples I gave are any combination appealing to the average r/MLSer and infrequent enough so as to not be a nuisance that it might be worth discussing including them as on-topic
I like to bend them over and pound them into submission
Monks. I really want to try every healing spec, and have tried 4 of 6 of them at level 100, but I just can't play a monk. Their healing animations bug me :(
Hes useful by not being useful, what a paradox that completely messes with my head.
Imig you guys don't, but the other one has selvedge in the middle ( I'm in high school so its cool to show off loooooool) and i can't tie a bow tie, plus am too lazy (millennial here)
Maybe text her back too... She sounds like a super nice lady
Have CP. Psn glfpunk
Serum Visions is good.
&gt;  nationalism is the only barrier that exists here and that barrier has been eroding relatively quickly.   The single Eurozone is unsustainable and doomed due to different economies and lower productivity of South-European countries, they can't directly compete with North-European countries while keeping the expensive euro.   The big welfare governments are going bankrupt too: they don't balance their budgets, reduce national debts or decrease regulation to improve economic growth.  Europe is very diverse economically and culturally. It cannot be forced when the people don't want it and have the majority have voted against it several times.   Integration is a natural process when people desire it and doesn't require a outdated centralized bureaucracy which has billions of euros unaccounted for.
I did the same :(   I've emailed them as well, let's see what happens! 
The current state. I'm so glad I live in Australia, right now. 
Badgers fucking badgers. They are like raccoons except they attack everything. If we could redirect all racial hate to go against badgers the world would be a happy place. Flowers, rainbows, and no badgers.
EVERYONE KNOWS "GLOBAL WARMING" IS A LIBERAL SCAM. IT JUST SNOWED HERE YESTERDAY!!!
No. You either don't eat as much as you think you do, or you should see a doctor.  Or allow some scientists to study you, as you'd be breaking the laws of physics.
Wait, what? She has two normal, healthy children, and they want more? Is she an only child? I don't understand.
Anyone without a neurological illness like cerebral palsy can learn to make near-photorealistic images. This is part of why art critics are more impressed by the creativity of Picasso than the world's best velvet Elvis artist. Not to implyyou think otherwise,
Pulled long pork.
So I'm guessing a bunch of tards from Briggs went over to the Cobalt reddit and made complete arses of themselves? Well done on coming across like a pack of immature wankers and representing the majority of decent people on Briggs in a negative way. Leave the discussions up to the SS leadership guys, that's why we have them talking to Cobalt. Going across and ruffling their feathers is not going to help our cause.
Yeah, I've had some success watching or playing subbed/dubbed things in French. And I like watching things with target language subtitles, once I reach the point where I sorta can.   I think I tend to think of things on too big a scale. I mean, would people still want to learn English if they could only read Vonnegut? If there're a few tiny parts of the overall culture that appeal to you, it might be enough to inspire you.   Thank you! Chinese is well in the future for me, though. I've finally got a handle on how much I really have to learn to be competent in French. It's always more than I thought, which is good. I'd hate to be bored. 
Oh damn you're right. Now I'm embarrassed. 
Nice try, gigantic spider waiting to eat me at the Australian airport. 
I would love to read this! If you come across it again, please link me. I'm heading into my fourth burn this year, and my third with my partner - the first was where we started dating and the second was quite overdramatic and difficult for us. I'm definitely looking for ways for us both to have a better burn this year and in the future.
Holy shit, a lot of ignorance on both sides in this thread.  I never knew pit bulls were this polarizing.  
Thanks! Online and ready :)
Lvl 32 hunter max ghorn psn jeouno
New line by Mike Typhson
You think if they were there every other week they would've realized it was her and not him.
love the case! Where’d you get it?
*She can't help but laugh.* 
:(
Eh, at least they will learn their lesson. Don't trust people... Equally.
Pantyhose and leotard! Great combination!
haha yes, Asking for upvotes is against reddit rules, even in a clever way, if you know what I mean. 
I disagree. I've found the games are always soft at 10NL. There's plenty of very high VPIP fish and spew monkeys
ahhhhh. ok. that makes much more sense.
One thing I know is to never trust the Internet in naming stuff. Otherwise you end up in The "Hitler did nothing wrong bar"
Because it shows that Pikachu has the potential to be good.
Today, you are my hero. Thank you!
The likely declined to publish the content of the tweets for fear of incurring the wrath of Zionists.
Seen upwards of 50mps signals with newest, best, most expensive router, and newest, best, most expensive adapter. Heard of Intel Engy's getting up to 100.
jesus christ how old are you? they need to investigate this first... way to jump the gun m8
hop over to /r/summonerschool and get better before the next family event. If he calls you a noob, embarrass him 1v1 and say you fucked his mom.
What's brown and sticky? A stick.
that happens when you let politicians lead those projects instead of engineers
Yeah... I don't like to think of myself as trans so I try my best to avoid things that make me think I am trans, especially IRL. I can deal with it on the internet, but I really hate the idea of talking to people about it face to face. 
Techies picker die.
Still pissed that I missed the musicians friend stupid deal of the day on that fat sandwich.   How's the Hot Rod Modded? I've got the stock pickups in my HSS strat for now, and the bucker is their "Diamondback" or something along those lines. The best word I heard that was used to describe was "plinky" and not in a bad way either. It's a little scopped, which is perfect for the strat sound. Could that by way it's not reacting well to your fat sandwich?  Typically, any pickup (like the Dragon II, which is one of my all time favorite neck pickups), that reacts well to volume changes, reacts well to drive pedals. If you had to change something about the big muff, what would you ask for? 
Thank you for understanding this. I still don't know why I would choose to buy or find tickets to play BR. Arma 3 BR will be easier on a person with little time to do select few games a week.
Bledsoe followed by Lawson
Not sure if there is a Podcast emmy or something but if there was Serial would walk away with all hardware. I listened to the last episode again today and thought about how well it was produced. 
Ticket blizzard. 
Yeah, I'm not commenting on anything other than the production. And regardless of the genre of music, I think every album can benefit from a producer who knows what he's doing. When you listen to an album like Here Come the Waterworks by Big Business, you can hear an example of something that sounds like pure sludge but it's intentional. It doesn't sound bad, it sounds perfectly fitting for those songs.  Thrash can be amazingly well produced and still be thrash. Just look at Megadeth. Funnily enough, if Metallica had hired Dave Mustaine to run their production their albums would sound incredible.
This is great stuff, but it kind of annoyed me they blocked the street just so they could shoot a video.  Surely there was a better location to film?
I showed this picture to my wife and she sent me this thread. I don't like it when she picks at my face looking for these. Now I find out other men are promoting this behaviour. She is going to cite this thread next time it comes up as a natural thing other men let women do to them. I don't know any of you personally but I somewhat hate you for this.
108
God told them to do that.
OR, because they eat all the time they take massive shits all the time. So having a big log in their butt just feels natural.
This will be fun..  http://smb.cdnllnwnl.neulion.com/u/nba/nba/thumbs/dl/7525_pc.jpg
I'm seventeen and I live with my 25-year old brother DJ, his girlfriend, and my niece.  He's always complaining about how I never clean my room. I cleaned it just now.
hard to believe they are really that blatant like this. 
Where are you going? What places are you visiting? 
&gt; Flaccid Downey Jr.  [I love you](http://i1.kym-cdn.com/photos/images/original/000/411/964/9b5.jpg)
Sounds like someone wants some pants jerky
&gt; And most of them probably just aren't ready or strong enough to do that yet.  Most of them are trying to get over all their grievances toward the religious and spiritual people, which are often, I might add, legitimate.  Once they heal up, they might wonder what's next?  But so long as the pain of religion and errant spirituality is still vivid in their mind, it may be hard to move on.
You'd think that making gaming more accessible would be a bigger talking point...
Kata fits into this team so damn good
Aww shit. Let's go. UVA shots fucked me, so I don't have a ticket but I can still chill here with my /r/CollegeBasketball bros, right? ^Sobs ^uncontrollably 
Why hasn't that been a shoe commercial yet? Dress Kyrie Irving up like a ref and just have him erupt during a game he's officiating. Easy money.
just yell **"XBOX RECORD THAT"**  or press "x" after you double tap the xbox button in the top-middle of your controller.
LOL. You can long tap an existing profile pop a menu to create a new one. You may need to disable beginner mode in prefrences. Once your new profile is created, from the task list in the old profile, if you drag from the right side of the screen, you should be able to move it between profiles or up and down in the list if you do not have a specific sort enabled. 
"Well she missed the worst of it, thankfully, before she came the city was a warzone. Asphalt conduit went crazy. Took everyone here to bring him down, and even then. We all lost something" *He was speaking of course, of his eye. He sighed and leaned backwards against the couch behind him and crossed his arms*  "Since she's been here, she's gotten her own place, saved one of our mutual friends, gotten a job, and basically, done everything she can to keep the peace. Nothing too major has happened, though I've had to take her out of a few sticky situations myself."
Mostly bio-related pre-nursing courses, but have a freshmen orientation course as well.
Tulo and Arrieta by a pretty wide margin. 
Didn't they shoot a scene about how Walt was back in remission tho?
is å pronounced 'ah' and æ pronounced 'āy?'
It's still amazing.  Isaac Newton was like a super genius. Nowadays people learn about Newtonian Physics in High School.
no way
Couldn't count the # of times I've heard Teep call out "they're all here" when there's only 2 players on him. 
as a northern who lives in New Orleans my view of the situation is that southerners are nice but not tolerant, Northerns are cold but tolerant. basically the south is openly nice to you but much more likely to look down upon your lifestyle. the north is more likely to telly you to fuck off if you try to have random conversations, but they are gonna let you do whatever the hell you want in private.  obviously this is a gross stereotype, but one I think generally holds true (for stereotype purposes)
[You missed the 3 other games where this situation came about and didn't work](http://youtu.be/90tJPBfHt-Q?t=1m26s) 
*He is merciless and attacks with force*
This! You have to have a bunch of vaccines to go. Tell them they are putting their children's spiritual future on the line if they don't get them vaccinated.   Because going on a mission is more important than not dying... sigh...
Digvorzhak is a good r5, not the best in the meta ATM but a really decent card. Utopia decks can use this to make ZW, I think the best rank 5 besides diamond would be pleiades though. I wonder if we'll see an ice princess zero into full armored crystal zero lancer combo when those cards come out.
Good stuff. I loves me some Mad Dog.
Do you know the history of Senntisten?
awesome, thank you!
It didn't work out as much as it could have. Rozier and Jones started hoisting up 3's when they couldn't penetrate the paint coverage. 
Your misuse of the word bigot is laughable.  
Also curious. Called my closest one and they said simply a "box" not sure what a "box" means. 
no im using version 1236 as the server i want to use is a couldron one and that's the latest one i can get
More technically, the overtime rules. The NFC championship game is the best example. Aaron Rodgers is the best best player for the Packers and he doesent even get to touch the field in OT. Kind of bullshit
As a metis guy, no one will lose their job because she is native. Native people are worthless in the eyes of the government. They are treated worse than scum.
it's the lean
You either have parasites, some serious metabolic condition, or you overestimate how much you actually eat. 
What happened to the chicken bites?
This post has been removed. Don't worry, you are not banned. You are not allowed to post numbers in your comments, they must be in your flair solely. Please make a new post, without numbers in them. **Written numbers like one, two, etc count as well, as does the word "number(s)" itself**.  *[I am a bot](/r/AutoModerator/comments/q11pu/what_is_automoderator/), and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose?to=%2Fr%2Ffriendsafari) if you have any questions or concerns.*
You can host a podcast feed anywhere, it's just a single xml file.  Have a look at Amazon S3's free tier.
With a USB headset? No. Also, the Kraken is absolutely terrible even for a _gaming_ headset, I'd suggest you upgrade to [these](http://www.audio-technica.com/cms/headphones/99aff89488ddd6b1/).  Then, grab one of [these](http://www.behringer.com/EN/Products/302USB.aspx). USB goes into your computer, and the PS4 goes into the "line" input.   Headphones plug into the lil' headphone jack, and Boom! you have your PC and PS4 running into your headphones. 
Maybe the meth made him paranoid.
Lalalalalalala... is that better?  http://www.reddit.com/r/melbourne/comments/2u974n/theyre_showing_a_tesla_at_chadstone_right_now/co6rv6p  Being honest with yourself isn't the same as being negative. 
Look, all I'm trying to say is on a show where almost everyone is a horrible, terrible person, those guys were thrown in close to the end when the evil threshold was already pretty high. It's just how I felt about it.
no idea! but the noise that one day was unbearable. Just a slow clanking of breaking up the cement just couldn't be drowned out. I wish they'd fix the potholes at least. 
Indians killing Pakistanis...? What...?
Oh my god! Xixo's Tinkmaster finish!!
Why didn't Light want him to take the notebook?
Maybe. I don't watch Weddle or Thomas enough to be the expert. And it's not Thomas' fault for having a great defense around him, if anything he's the biggest reason why they're so great. I just feel that after watching them both objectively Weddle is better and does a lot more with less to prove it.
If you airblast a a rocket it becomes yours No damage would of been dealt to teamates
That's going to be a nice bit of ink when it's done!  You're going to be sitting in that chair for many hours by the look of it - but totally worth it.
The real conspiracy here is that murders of innocent civilians like this happen almost daily, and nothing changes. As if the whole society would be becoming blind to events like this... What next? A dead skinny  17 years old girl today. Murder of thought criminals because of scary internet posts tomorrow?
They genuinely believe things like 9/11 being a hoax, the holocaust being exaggerated, and that is if they have even heard of 9/11 in the first place. There are many people in Islamic countries who simply only know what they have been told and have not come into contact with an opposing narrative.  If you look at the way Western forces left Iraq and Afghanistan it looks like a defeat to them. It's not a massive jump to think you can straight out defeat them, if you are a suggestible young enthusiastic person with genuine grievances that can be exploited.
How are you trying to connect the hard drives? eSata?  Have you considered just getting a new case for the server that fits more hard drives? For mATX, the Fractal Design Node 304 &amp; 804 fit 6 &amp; 8 HDDs respectively. That's if you've got a motherboard that supports the number or can get a sata PCIe card. 
Intere$ting que$tion, I think for $ure having a popular $erie$ would be important to me. For $ure. 
Good luck! :D
I can't relate, but it's possible that you have internalized transphobia. Maybe make a couple of lists, why you feel like a woman, things you don't like about living as a man, and ways that your life will change if you transition (in negative or positive ways). This might help you clarify where you stand and take your fingers out of your ears, as you said. 
I would pass on this one. 
So would Brandon Wood  lots of strikeouts make it tougher to succeed, not impossible
WTF. I don't even. 
Yeah, I wear the same size shoes as my dad, so that's pretty neat.
Ah there's that North Carolina ego rearing its ugly head again. Lots to love about South Carolina, why can't we be friends?
* Officers can get away with [shooting your 7yo daughter in the face](http://www.policestateusa.com/2014/aiyana-stanley-jones-raid/).  * Officers can get away with [tossing an explosive into your childs crib](http://abcnews.go.com/US/family-toddler-injured-swat-grenade-faces-1m-medical/story?id=27671521).  * Now pick up that can.  EDIT:  Well, since it looks like this is going to stay at the top, it should probably serve a more useful purpose than just to be snarky.  * None of the occupants knew anyone was a suspect until police kicked in the door.  * There were daytime opportunities to grab the suspect that didn't involve a raid.  * They brought a TV crew and waited for a nighttime raid because raids = exciting television. * The officer tried to escape responsibility of his negligence by framing up the grandmother.  * The officer made claims that ran counter to testimony provided by other police on the scene.  * The suspect they wanted wasn't even in the house at the time.  EDIT2:  Blue-linked the top-bullet points clarify that the 'flashbang in the crib' was from a *different SWAT raid*.  Some readers seemed to think it was from the same incident;  These are separate tragedies.  EDIT3+: - I well understand frustration and hatred, but the racist comments peppering my inbox and some of the vitriol ITT is intensely depressing and counter-productive.  These were American children and that should motivate all Americans to band together to collectively demand reforms, not deepen divisions amongst ourselves.
[Link To Original Submission](http://reddit.com/2uctt0)  ______  ^^I ^^Am ^^A ^^Bot. ^^Please ^^Message ^^/u/FurSec ^^if ^^you ^^have ^^any ^^feedback ^^or ^^suggestions.
I can't sit cross legged. It's not possible without perhaps a lot of narcotic painkillers.  But continue your example considering that...
Any time
Or the thing about blood being blue before it is exposed to oxygen. Yeah, it's been posted about a million times...
Therefore she deserved to die. Good case my friend.
Thank you for the insight! I will make sure to be patient with it :)
We are at the Twin Selection Ceremony. Here is where the council decides which of the two, when they have come of age, is more suited to live in Aragasia. Each year, on the first day of the year, thousands of twins gather to be given their fate; life or death.  Unfortunately for me, I already know my fate.  Tim put his hand on my shoulder, consoling me. "Cheer up, Jim. You'll be going to a better place, I'm sure of it! Just remember the good times!" I smiled weakly at my brother. Perfect Tim. He always had the better grades and the better social skills. Heck, I can't think of anything I can do better than my twin brother. I love him, I really do, but it's hard not to resent someone who basically signed your death warrant.  "You're right, Tim. I had a good life. Thanks for being an amazing brother." I feel a tinge of guilt at the praise. The truth is, he *is* an amazing brother. But that just makes me even more angry sometimes. It bothers me that I never had a chance at life when he was clearly the superior sibling. In reality, being with Tim made me feel like little more than a shadow.  "Jim and Tim Stevenson" Called the announcer. We stepped up to the podium together, shoulder to shoulder. The fact that I'm about to die doesn't bother me, not really. I'm scared about losing my brother. We did everything together, every since we were born. Even though I never felt like I accomplished much while he was shining so brightly, he never made me feel like that. We were best buddies. I don't want to lose him.  "Tim and Jim are both extraordinary citizens, as most of you know." Continued the head of the council, an elderly gentlemen with a cane that he didn't really need. "In fact, together they logged around 400 hours of community service last year alone!" This comment was followed by a deafening roar created by the millions of live viewers. Parents, family, friends, all coming to see which one of us would die.  Of course, the applause *would* make me feel good, if it wasn't originally Tim's idea to do the community service.  "Yes, they are indeed model citizens. Unfortunately, as the law says, only one of them may leave here today. So without further ado..."  Silence. Well, at least I think it's silence. I couldn't hear anything over the sound of my heartbeat anyway. The councilman gently reached into an envelope, carefully pulling out a small slip of paper. He began to unfurl it. He looked at it the pulled the microphone to his lips.  "Tim Stevenson has been chosen to continue in this world. Please give a round of applause to his other half, Jim Stevenson, may he rest in peace!"  The audience began to shout and cheer, but I didn't hear anything. Of course they chose to kill me, I expected this. Tim is the better twin, he deserves to live. It's better this way. I keep telling myself that, but it doesn't seem to help.  "Jim, please step forward now." In front of the councilman was a platform that descended to the kill room. They say it's painless. I hope so. I take a deep breath as I prepare to end my own life.  Unfortunately for me, that breath is long forgotten somewhere in my chest. Tim has stepped forward, onto the platform.   "Goodbye, Jim" Said the councilman. Tim looked at me as the platform began to descend into the floor. He smiled and gave me a thumbs-up. I stared back at him, tears running down my face with a look of utter disbelief on my face. Tim. The perfect brother. The perfect person. Giving his life for me.   "STOP!" I yell. But no one stops. They expect this. It's common for brothers and sisters to not want their twin to die. Little do they know they're killing the wrong one. "STOP! PLEASE!" I fall to my knees, suddenly feeling very ill. This isn't right. How can this be happening. He deserves to live, not me. Why did he do this to himself? Why did he do this to me? Blackness began to takeover, so I let it.  ____  "Tim? Tim, wake up."   I groaned as I shifted around on a bed I don't remember getting into. I rubbed near my eyes, which had dried tears on them. The memories of the ceremony came back to me to make fresh ones again. I sit up on the hospital bed and shudder.  "How can this have happened..." I whisper to myself.  "It was meant to be" Says the priest sitting next to my bed, whose name is apparently Myself. "You were the superior species. Don't worry, it is best this way"  I groaned at the situation. No one could understand what I feel like right now. I had the perfect brother. Now I don't. And he's dead because of me.   I look up, suddenly determined.   I'm not going to let his death be meaningless.  I'll be even better than he was.  I'll be Tim Stevenson. Better than Jim ever was.   _____  This post was part of a sprint at https://kiwiirc.com/client/irc.snoonet.org/writingprompts  thanks all for participating! :) (sorry for the rushed ending hehe)
Don't mention it. No bride needs the extra stress or to feel as though she is being judged. In the big picture, it doesn't matter. 
Wait, really? No. Or?
I'm in Ontario (GTA actually) and have a bottle I used once.  It didn't work well for me.  I could ship it to you if you like.  Or depending on where you're located we could possibly meet at a Tim's or something.
It's not a joke, but it's reposted from the site "Badass of the Week" so that should explain the tone. It's not so much "glorifying a killer serving the state" as it is glorifying someone who almost single-handedly prevented the invasion of a would-be occupying force. I'm sure it was posted to provide a contrast to Chris Kyle, who served as a sniper for an aggressive occupier. I'm not sure, however, why this wouldn't be obvious.
Not every religious person or most religious people are out their claiming heads for their God
If you think ghosts is fine, then sure. Thats the perspective. Some lobbies, people only use op weapons. Some lobbies have cheaters. But if you leave and find another lobby, it's fine. Same as previous years.
I think the closest thing is "Kansasopoly" which is the KU version of the college monopolies that they sell.
He didn't technically die, but when Eren got eaten by a fucking Titan not even halfway through attack on Titan I was like "how the hell you gonna kill the main character on like episode 7?"
Optometrist, I need not. Miraluka teacher, I need.  Told me to "off screw" the optometrist did.
I don't think it's true really, it's just a funny notion that someone might make up a really tragic story in the hope they might get a super rare gun. I doubt people actually have done it.
Yep I also think it's why some people say it tastes like iced tea and peaches while others say it's salty
and now i hate Perry with a passion. I can't stand it if somebody forcefully violates Ruby and takes away her innocence.
Fun fact. You can tell turbo mr2's from non-turbo mr2's by the raised or [ flat grille fins](http://i01.i.aliimg.com/img/pb/326/172/425/425172326_528.jpg) over the rear engine cover.
Thanks Boss
This show was fantastic. Oh and the guy sitting behind me asked if "The black dude" was Jay-Z
I won't even bother to pirate.  There's so many games available last years,  devs acting like this make the choice easier. 
We beat them without their second best player, they're used to playing our pace, and they have a bench that can go toe to toe with ours, as well as way better defense. We aren't a great match up against them.
32   I sleep a lot.   I don't want to go out because I would rather play videogames.  I think about my future health.  I worry about my parents health.  I'm more stern with companies/sales people.  I feel exhausted.  I know how to dress... but don't feel like it.  I'm grumpy sometimes.  I don't want to miss out on anything in life before I get too old.  I desperately want to complete my life goals.
I think you're providing arguments for why it SHOULD be legalized. The OP, I think, wants opposing arguments.
It looks like it might not do anything at all. No heals or protections to friendly minions either. :c
Sniped! Deposited a lvl. 13 female Zubat instead.
Pizza &amp; cake
Looks like a lighthouse
Personally I'd eat it. And it would be fucking delicious. There's nothing wrong with cooking it and eating. 
What are you on about? Nobody said he was. Everyone is laughing at a missed chance and you're trying to be some righteous defender? Everyone messes up and gets shit for it, get over it. 
What you're pointing out is that TB will provide reasoning for his opinions that is very persuasive. That's why you accept it (and why I accept it as well, even if I don't agree). I can at least understand how he got there and why.  Contrast that with Arthur Gies Bayonetta 2 Review at Polygon. He unequivocally states his opinion as fact that Bayonetta is rife with sexism, without arguing **why this is** or providing any sort of example or reasoning that can be attributed to backing up his opinions.  That's the difference between someone doing good criticism (TB) and someone doing shit-tier criticism (Polygon)
So perfect
*She gets off* 
&gt;They will. We have 3-4 years of the show left.  Select actors who previously had 6 year contracts recently signed on for a seventh season. So at least 2 years left of the show. I know people want 10 season, but I'd be concerned with the show dying slowly. I'd much rather have them end it on a high note. I hope for 8 seasons. The problem is the show blowing through and skipping over available content  &gt;Even though the show knows the ending, he will most certainly change his mind on things as he's writing it.  I'm not so sure D&amp;D knows how the story will end. GMMR supposedly told them, but who knows if he purposely told them something different or was intent on change the ending later on because he figured the show would beat the books. Either way, I don't think it's a bad thing. Fans can enjoy show, then look forward to a different outcome with the books.
Anyone else think [Justise Winslow](https://nbccollegebasketballtalk.files.wordpress.com/2015/01/cd0ymzcznguwzdbhnduynddiytjhm2yyzthlmtjjotqwyyznptuynza0odk1mzy0yzg3zmizowq2mtk4zdzkothjmja0-e1422029188822.jpeg?w=277) looks like [Chris Partlow](http://upload.wikimedia.org/wikipedia/en/f/f0/The_Wire_Partlow.jpg) from the Wire?
IIRC there actually *is* a limit. Its just huge. 256 I believe.
Looks like the screen started artifacting...
what was that, cmon impact you're better than this
It's the best in my opinion for watching vids. Kudos!
Haha, it's cool, I gathered what you meant. I hope you're right.
Wait you mean the series were Punisher did [this](http://i.imgur.com/YOg2fpc.jpg), [this](http://i.imgur.com/cYwi6XQ.jpg) and [this](http://s8.photobucket.com/user/KoL_Monkeypunch/media/punisherhulkbuster.jpg.html) might be unreliable... 
Well, if they had their land and buffalo... this couldn't have happened.  so, we all should be sympathetic to their plight whether it be in the strip clubs of vegas or camping out on the highway in oka.
He got banned because his cheat was detected, not because of the reports. That would be a different ban message. That means he cheated for a while already.
Roger is running from serious fraud charges because Earth laws don't apply on Ganymede.
Under the leadership of Ban Ki Moon they would all clearly gain some capacity for being concerned about a great many things all at once.
She probably jumps.
Good idea! Thanks!
CATS!!!
It isn't? 
He gets to go to class and tell all his friends he has the rare Wii Fit Trainer. Coolest kid in school.
And? No place outside of schools (for the most part) require kids to show vaccine proof. all places that work with pets require the shots.
Pues yo le llevaría, sería una reacción de lo más inteligente acurrucarse en cualquier rincón y echarse a dormir. Quizá los demás aprendieran, por fin, algo del mundo animal.
A little more in depth than that, but thanks.
EU teams usually tend to be much better at SnD than NA teams
I would like someone to help create one for me as i lack resources and money to do it unfortunately. Laugh or whatever bug i've always dreamed to professionally game like a proper youtuber yaknow
I don't get /r/food, I see garbage up here all the time.  I post a perfectly rare sous vide buffalo steak with a perfect runny poached egg on top, nothing.  Also not taken with a potato...
Did you have to soak/replace the chips during the night?
Waking up, going to the bathroom (lol), then getting back in bed and snuggling with my bird(s). Sometimes I'll get a walnut milk latte, which are heavenly.
Plus it would allow same-sex couples to have their own kids without having to go through a human surrogate (and hence bypassing a lot of complicated laws regarding paternity and parent rights and whatnot). Can't hate that.
Spiders. Everyone hates them but the regulate annoying bugs
Pretty much!
I don't recommend watching it :o
Put down your flair.
It's custom. There are a few companies out there that make rigid frames for new trumps. You'll probably be putting at least another $1500+ on top of the stock bike if you want to go this route. If you want someone to build it for you (which is lame), then you're going to be dropping some serious dough.
I didn't, Thanks a lot!  Definitely going to double down on the cheese. 
Your post does not match the title format for this subreddit. Please follow this exact format:  **[H] What you have [W] What you want**  Note that spaces are important.  This post has been removed - feel free to fix your title and resubmit.  Please see the [FAQ](http://redd.it/quw61) and [format guide](http://redd.it/sw72u) for more information.   *[I am a bot](/r/AutoModerator/comments/q11pu/what_is_automoderator/), and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose?to=%2Fr%2FSteamGameSwap) if you have any questions or concerns.*
Nonono it's "land a fart"
Accurate. I don't know many people my age (uni) who would like to live in Warsaw (and if somebody already does live there, is very cynical about it).
Well, there's no evidence they actually went to the video store, is there?  Let's pretend that somehow this fits into the timeline in a way that makes (seems unlikely)  Maybe after Hae was killed Adnan and Jay called Nisha to create a potential alibi to say they were at the video store.  This doesn't seem very plausible to me.
Birdman
The Crucial MX100 256GB is $10 more than that 850.
If this game ended the way it did in regulation I'd be happier.
Cool info. Just don't like all the hype Bear gets. Honesty matters and Bear only got honest after he was called out. 
They called it ["Superventricular Tachycardia."](http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Supraventricular_tachycardia) At the time, I didn't know that that's just a catch-all term describing a messed-up heart rhythm originating above a certain point in the heart.  I found that out a bit later, at which point I was more concerned about not being concerned about it to find out what it was *really* called, if that makes sense.
*I nod.*
I have one of these too, and I never wear it because it's unlined and I have perky nipples.  But damn if it isn't the most comfortable underwire bra I've ever tried on.
Apparently this song was intended to have a 1950s doo-wop type of sound to it, but it ended up sounding like reggae.
&gt;  She clearly states at least twice that he was walking in and that it was an adult video store.  I guess the question is how she would know where Adnan really was seeing she was at her home while talking to him on the phone.  Ouija board?   FaceTime early adopter?  
Hey, you can do the Alaska trick in reverse! Throw room temperature water in the air and watch it boil!
[First result when you Google "French and Italians paying terrorists for hostages."](http://nytimes.com/2014/07/30/world/africa/ransoming-citizens-europe-becomes-al-qaedas-patron.html)
Eat my soul, nothing.... that cat looks like he wants to fuck me.
No. 2
Hmm, I think I should miss it if it's overnight on Sunday. It should be up Sunday GMT and then down early Monday morning, when I'll be in bed and then off to work in the morning. For once, it's conveniently timed for me. :p
Yeah, it is really weird the way it is written.   FYI, OP, the Hebrew word in the middle is gibberish. 
Or draft players for needed positions and develop them how you want. 
&gt; So take into consideration that LGBT advancement could have negative implications on Christianity. I would love to hear your response.  May well be. BUT Christianity HAS had negative implications on LGBT advancement, rights, and lives. So what I would like to hear, why are you so upset about Christianity maybe having, for a while, to suffer through what it has inflicted on others for centuries?
"what song is that" "darude sandstorm" "sanrude dankstorm"
hi i am from norway, although my skill is not the best i think i am up to the task plz consider me :) i can play eny role but i am best at mid and carry
No doubt the best burger ever
An old fashioned masturbation machine involving a weird stool and a wheel with feathers on it. It turned out to be a museum of sex 
&gt; shakira law 
All kinds of birds, bitches be unpredictable yo
I used to be the same. Now I actually do gain a bit of weight because I had a baby. My mum is not the same. 7 kids and can't gain weight. I don't gain much though.  I've never made it over 58kgs at 5 foot 4 (sorry don't know how to write that properly). Used to be 44kg and A cups. Now range between 54 and 58 with seemingly gravity defying D cups. Woo
It's time, OP!  Be you a deliverer or a disappointer?
welcome to na lcs? that was really bad by impact...
Why the hell doesn't anyone use gfycat for gifs that large?  http://www.gfycat.com/AnxiousSeriousAtlanticsharpnosepuffer  33mbs down to ~1mb.
There is only one path and that is the path you take, but you can take more than one path. -- Marathon Infinity  Actually that whole terminal screen is my favorite quote.
Makakalack 31 Hunter max ib
#####&amp;#009;  ######&amp;#009;  ####&amp;#009;  [**Miller–Urey experiment**](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Miller%E2%80%93Urey%20experiment): [](#sfw)   ---  &gt;The __Miller–Urey experiment__  (or __Miller experiment__)  was a chemical [experiment](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Experiment) that simulated the conditions thought at the time to be present on the [early Earth](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Early_Earth), and tested the [chemical origin of life](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Abiogenesis). Specifically, the experiment tested [Alexander Oparin](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Alexander_Oparin)'s and [J. B. S. Haldane](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/J._B._S._Haldane)'s hypothesis that conditions on the primitive Earth favored chemical reactions that synthesized more complex [organic compounds](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Organic_compound) from simpler inorganic precursors. Considered to be the classic experiment investigating [abiogenesis](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Abiogenesis), it was conducted in 1952  by [Stanley Miller](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Stanley_Miller), under the supervision of [Harold Urey](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Harold_Urey), at the [University of Chicago](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/University_of_Chicago) and later the [University of California, San Diego](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/University_of_California,_San_Diego) and published the following year.  &gt;====  &gt;[**Image**](https://i.imgur.com/aRGts1m.png) [^(i)](https://commons.wikimedia.org/wiki/File:Miller-Urey_experiment-en.svg) - *The experiment*  ---  ^Interesting: [^Cyanoacetylene](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Cyanoacetylene) ^| [^Harold ^Urey](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Harold_Urey) ^| [^Carbonyl ^sulfide](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Carbonyl_sulfide) ^| [^Primordial ^soup](https://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/Primordial_soup)   ^Parent ^commenter ^can [^toggle ^NSFW](/message/compose?to=autowikibot&amp;subject=AutoWikibot NSFW toggle&amp;message=%2Btoggle-nsfw+co77hax) ^or[](#or) [^delete](/message/compose?to=autowikibot&amp;subject=AutoWikibot Deletion&amp;message=%2Bdelete+co77hax)^. ^Will ^also ^delete ^on ^comment ^score ^of ^-1 ^or ^less. ^| [^(FAQs)](http://www.np.reddit.com/r/autowikibot/wiki/index) ^| [^Mods](http://www.np.reddit.com/r/autowikibot/comments/1x013o/for_moderators_switches_commands_and_css/) ^| [^Magic ^Words](http://www.np.reddit.com/r/autowikibot/comments/1ux484/ask_wikibot/)
So I have to ask since they aren't updating the bracket. How well did aMSa do in his Melee Singles pool? And how well did hbox do in his Smash 4 singles pool?
a vacuum cleaner can suck up dead skin flakes but not a live human. same principle. ship hulls are much sturdier than asteroids.
Thanks! I had a 3 hour drive back from the dealership, I'm a long way towards in love with it already.
Hey, your Scizor didn't learn Bullet Punch because it has to be at level 1 D:  I think you can Heart Scale it on, though
snake eyez = west coast aka all the socal hugging rubbed off on him
The situation facing hardcore Adnan-is-guilty users has become not much different to that of evangelical Christians posting in /r/atheism. They will almost certainly fail to convince a significant number of users to adopt their level of certainty. Once they understand that fact (as most do), what's left? Complain complain complain. Antagonize antagonize antagonize.  Think about this: would all the 99% certain Adnan-is-guilty users enjoy being in their own sub, with no one to complain about or antagonize? I highly doubt it. Would all the other users enjoy being in their own sub, without any of the 99% certain users? I strongly suspect so.
&gt;  &gt; Didn't the lead singer from Sum 41 become a pretty horrific alcoholic?  Yup, he'll die if he has another drink. 
Gotcha
No, German troops attacking from the west and Finnish troops from the north did not meet on soviet ground. Mainly because the Fins did not advance beyond certain points, when they were satisfied with their gains.   However there were German troops in Finland and attacking into Russia, mainly in the far north.  So they fought side by side on the Soviet/Finland boarder, but never met with the Eastern front. 
0:15 MLG AMMO!!!! 
Here is what the linked meme says in case it is blocked at your school/work or is unavailable for any reason:  #***Awkward Penguin*** &gt;***Post Title:***  *My group was the first to finish at least*   &gt;***Top:***  *GET ASSIGNED PARTNER  WORK IN CLASS*   &gt;***Bottom:***  *DO ENTIRE THING BY MYSELF WITHOUT SO MUCH AS LOOKING AT MY PARTNER*  [Original Link^1](http://imgur.com/iwMyHEF) | [Meme Template^2](http://imgur.com/memegen/create/iwMyHEF)
It's around 11-12bb/100, obv depending how loose u play
Actually yeah I was playing in my head the idea of a rail to New Senntisten, if only to more easily take advantage of that sweet, sweet nether portal.
It's a lot of fun to make! It's taking forever though.
I have a pair of Red Wing Iron Rangers in black, size 11. They're a bit big for me so I don't wear them nearly as much as I had hoped. Great condition. $150 OBO  It may be a bit of stretch, but I've also got a Frr Canada raccoon fur ushanka style hat that I'm looking to sell. Hasn't seen much use at all, extremely warm for those in colder climates. Size XL $100 OBO  Pics available upon request.
expected noscope 360, op didn't deliver 0/420
&gt; It sounds like (phonetically) in my family: Un shy-zer un footz or footz ien shy-zer. Cannot get it right because it is a mix.  This footz .. thing could be : "Fotze" its an crude word for Vagina. shyzer could be maybe : "Scheiser"  what measn something like "pooper"
A scientist in antarctica got a date on tinder with a girl at a reasearch station 45 minutes away
&gt; And so why did the Colts balls register as fully inflated  can you find a source that says they were?  NO.  Nobody has released any data on pre-game or mid game PSI.  If they were 13.5 pre-game they could still be 12.5 mid game and thus, still within regulation.
Happens to me on xbone all the time. Usually if I main menu it fixes it. 
Slicked! How goes it?
&gt;Most European countries live under religious rule and the Vatican City is in Europe for crying out loud.  True, but Europe also has lower rates of church attendance and a larger fraction of their population identifies as non-believers. And that's my point - the fact that attitudes have changed doesn't negate the fact that they were 'inherited' from the colonizing powers.  And it also supports my general thesis - medical culture bends to reflect societies' attitudes. In the US, when medicine was moving from a traditional to scientific basis, doctors already believed that circumcision was good and homosexuality was bad, so circumcision was deemed 'more hygienic' and homosexuality was a 'mental illness'. In the UK at the same time, circumcision was more of a passing fad of the upper class and homosexuality was bad, so homosexuality was also a 'mental illness' there, while circumcision was treated as a purely religious issue.  And the fact that there's so much turnover of justification strongly supports that the UK happened to be correct on this one point - every generation of American men gets circumcised, but for a different reason, every generation of doctors thinks to older justifications are silly, but the new one is rock-solid. The strongest historical reason was probably cervical cancer - properly done epidemiological studies in the US supported it - and then the HPV-cancer link was discovered and when corrected for, the link disappeared. Then all of the sudden it's time to make HIV the justification *du jour*.  Or as I once heard it put: Circumcision is a cure in search of a disease.  &gt;Online doctors gave me good non-emotional information. Intactivists were extremely emotional and lacked good information.  Doctors are more likely to be calm and objective sounding than activist groups, yes. So if you want to make a good comparison go talk to doctors who are opposed - ask those European medical groups why they disagree with their American peers, and skip the online no-nothings.  &gt;Because infants won't remember the procedure.  Again, give me some other situation where that argument is generally accepted. In every example I can come up with - from 'borrowing' someone's car while their on vacation to having sex with an unconscious person - 'they don't remember' simply isn't a defense.
It usually gets downvoted so that could be why you never see it. 
the stream starts at 630 and the fights start at 7, so theyre about to start
Fixed, nevermind.
nice!
Ctrl-f "Florida"  Yup. 
We can still have this match of the day just make another one with healers banned. I don't hate them but every game is decided by them and it makes the match boring. 
The guy on the right looks like the Mormon prophet Joseph Smith. For some reason it wouldn't surprise me if he went to parties like this.
is this me ,_, 
no level but I'll bite - invite sent  all filled :D
Mostly a lurker here, but would love to join the chain! UN is plankgiirl_ Thankyou!
Can someone please help, before the thread dies?
Yea. Chemistry, physics, and biology were things I was looking at. Would you happen to know how these are applied to hospital jobs, besides lab/research? Or are the lab/research jobs mostly what I would get with those types of degree?
I've heard. Graham was also a basketball player!
That's what I figured out recently. I eat pretty much whenever I feel a little bit hungry, so I thought I probably ate a lot in comparison to most people. When I took the time to actually analyse my diet, it turns out I'm just not hungry very much.
cool deck, i cant wait to see what you come up with in sideboard, might show this to a friend who has a similar deck too
Start merged mining in the mining software for both alts, mining on a new shared chain. Start that chain with a genesis block that contains all UTXO's from the other two. Update the wallets for both alts to start using the shared second chain. Done! 
It happened a week ago.
Despite all the orange at Sun Life Stadium, we have a strong fandom that lives and dies by the Dolphins. The fact is most of our fans are spread out across the country and Florida is full of transplants. Hopefully once the stadium is renovated the stadium won't look so empty during games. 
Probably all of their fathers were kamikaze pilots
Ayyy shit that's hideous. Nice work! :D
You could try fitting your Grados with bowl (G-cush) pads. Otherwise the DT880 Premium ~~80-ohm~~ 32-ohm would be my recommendation. The AKGs sound very different to your Grados (IME they don't have that "edge" that Grados have) and will need an amp.  EDIT: derp, was thinking of the DT770 80-ohm
Heard of insurance?
Sorry, I dont see a connection or any reason to think of God in human terms or concepts. For me, to think we can understand God or place human qualities on God seems wrong and  kind of arrogant. Its more like people are developing a God to fit their concepts and hopes of what God is. If God is jealous then its ok if we are too.
Thats also another thibg holding me up. I obviously use my own equipment, but im tryjng to build a client base. I need to weigh my needs with theirs and right now i could do a few excersises with the bigger ones but not enough to warrant buyong them when i could offer more clients more options. Im sure im underestimating myself but I want to master each weight before I move up or go double.  As far as bulking up, im more looking to recomp about 3-5% bodyfat then maintain.
Everyone hated on Shane for shooting the fat guy in the leg to get the medicine, but it was the only option. Fat guy put them in that predicament, fat guy gets them out of it. Seemed pretty fair to me
*Librarian approaches, holding her knives in a sheath.*  "Hello." She says
Thanks for the chance to taste you flavors! Very good luck and congrats!
*Gwen pushes Victoria into Heather to get her to hug her.*
Jesus fucking Christ. If this kid flung a fireball or some shit I get it, but this is full on retarded. 
Thanks for the Garbodor! Very unique! Also very smooth and quick! Great giveaway!
Will do.
What does Ja rule think about all of this?
Wtf?
Thank you! I'll be right over!
So good to see so many familiar Ontario spots in here... The Hammer gets a tough rap as a city but things like this and especially the Devil's Punchbowl...such great finds!
Fair enough. It's reddit, and life can't always be taken so seriously. 
Weirdly enough, they don't seem to scuff easily. Mine've been abused quite a bit and they still look fairly new.
No. Unless you can show that pitbulls and Rottweilers involved in the attacks are disproportionately not-neutered and male in sufficient numbers to account for those breeds attacking people in disproportionately high numbers, your citation doesn't disprove that the breed is problematic.   Not all pitbulls/Rotties are mean attack dogs, but most of the mean attack dogs are pitbulls/Rotties. That's a huge problem and redditors pushing the pro pitbulls/Rotties agenda are frustratingly in denial over this.  Edit: fixed typo
what i actually meant is, why does twitch allow this? use their servers to stream but move any other monetization method away from them and use your own model? why?
We need a pinned masterpost with all the archives. I can't keep up with the new releases.
I didn't know that! This makes me feel a bit better for sure.
brown royal and simple green are great too. I like brown royal for heavier duty jobs and simple green for everything else. zep citrus is also a decent one
I assumed it was someone's hipster Caturday way of saying breaking rules. I could be wrong.
jesus, what a comeback.
The PNW is a wonderful place 
I am yet to spew but I feel your pain.
I would be happy to see new episodes. 
And it gets infected :/
/u/Honestly_ is often the money man
My daughter has my old Jungle book one. I wish I could find one NIB, wow!!!
For the future, I would suggest taking lots of screencaps and screen capping the f3 screen periodically.  It shows cords and would be a permanent record of what you are doing where.
He's also in "Kama Sutra: A Tale of Love" with Vivienne's VA, who is also Ellaria Sand in GoT.
You know how you change things to be how you think they should be?  You vote.
pls
Hello.  *Max says without opening his eyes.*
# #OneTrueBrowser  /s   odd that it would be a different image for different browsers though.
Honestly piglet is a good AD and will do well I'm sure. 
I was also poking at the "we live in a simulation" theory
There's no such thing as moral truth, morality is relative.
insane. I remember when moltov was getting the wr not too long ago with 1:27.  its crazy to see how far this category has come.  huge congrats to marco, he's been working really hard on this category for a long time.
 NICE
You seem heavily invested in dissuading people from investigating something you claim you're not worried about.   Why are you spending so much time telling people to stop, if you don't care? 
&gt;[**YEEEEAAAAAAAAHH [0:07]**](http://youtu.be/6YMPAH67f4o)  &gt; [*^degenexo*](https://www.youtube.com/channel/UCNS6DzH2Io8Lpr72eRtXeGQ) ^in ^Entertainment  &gt;*^1,825,202 ^views ^since ^Feb ^2010*  [^bot ^info](http://www.reddit.com/r/youtubefactsbot/wiki/index)
No other October 3rds? 
&gt; Jeg vil gerne spørge hvorfor du synes at 40-50 dødsfald om året er skræmmende? For i min optik er det et utroligt lille tal. &gt;   Ja lad os få nogle flere dødsfald /s
I said this from the start. There has only been 1 video that showed the actual kill and even it was highly edited. People may ask, "why would the hostages play along?". I would say because anyone would rather fake their death than actually die even if it was for ISIS.
Sold.
Sure. The entire sky's nodetree is pretty complex but I might be able to break it down and describe each effect separately. I could also consider PM'ing a few interested people the file, or outright posting it depending on the level of interest...   the main thing is that I don't want my work floating around the internet uncredited.  What would you prefer?
I think we've just discovered the fandom's sburb land. 
Sweet dude, have a nice day man!
Nope, just teeny, tiny Murica'!
Kotor was the best but many of these are awesome too. I totally agree with OP though. This goes out to all the folks that are getting ready to contribute to the SW universe...ahem...DO NOT FUCK THIS UP!!! You literally can't. The work is pretty much done for you. Be creative. All us fans want new ideas! But do NOT turn SW into typical bland Hollywood shit!!! We seriously, actually could rise up and come after you. 
Need to steal this to decorate the house for my football-loving husband... thanks in advance!
I thought so initially as well, but if you stick to `auto x = y`, then it has the same structure as when you declare type equations: `using T = U`. It's a small thing, but it makes the language a bit more consistent for day-to-day\* use.  \* By day-to-day I mean most uses. If you're contributing code to the boost library then you of course will use dark, scary features that mere mortals should not touch.
That pretty much nails it. There is also all the people who are moving down there to skip out on child support, taxes and criminal cases of fraud.
http://intsports.net/str12.html HD
man, I've always wanted to be cool for 5 minutes at a time
Obviously you're not a golfer.
Why did you downvote me D: I was joking, Guess I haven't been here long enough to swear at the mods and laugh it off as a joke :/ 
I'm not trying to argue with you, but do you have a source to the claim that it is all bullshit? 
No lasting damage from the illness, I hope?
I noticed in the image that got the video taken down in the first place, Larry Hryb, aka MajorNelson was on the pro side. I thought he condemned GG pretty soundly. Can someone clarify his stance? 
Except they havn't been quiet for two weeks.....   Last weekend was supposed to be the beta for this CU..... They pulled it at the last minute.   So a week ago they talked about it.  You want daily we are still working on it messages.  
nvm worked this time XD
I don't even see him.
Buzzfeed already has a list for this http://www.buzzfeed.com/spenceralthouse/movie-titles-that-perfectly-describe-your-sex-life?s=mobile
Shit this woman is sexy as FUCK!
Mine didn't :( here's to hoping I see it tomorrow! Happy birthday man
I was literally about to post about how I wish there was a mod that did the dynamic city naming, since I remembered that great part of Rhye's and Fall. Thanks!  EDIT: Realized that through Mac modding, I'd need a direct download. Can anyone give me a hand with a link? Having trouble via Civ Fanatics
no because the brain can repair itself, miraculously
Thanks, updating atm
So, why are you still here typing on Reddit?  Doesn't seem a choice that matches your moral bravery.
You were the chosen one ScreaM
:)
The cat in the top left is psychic.
I'd upvote you...but that flair.  Edit: Happy Cakeday  Edit 2: Decided to upvote because of edit 1.
[Source.](http://www.pornhub.com/view_video.php?viewkey=1617047935)
I noticed that before. Doesnt matter much IMO 
Both my partner and younger sister live and work in Surrey (Epsom and Guildford) near London and their experiences with rent and general living costs there is awful. Whenever I go down there on a visit I experience both an economic and a culture shock.
Im not certainly not hating om anybody. Just being sad of his fail, that's it. 
.... No.
Gay
I would tell you, but I'll need 50 bucks as payment.
I expected this reaction. Dog ownership obviously plays into it, never doubted that. As for my 'high horse'... well. Whatever. I don't feel strongly enough about it to get cheeky with you.  Facts are facts, and there they are. Believe them if you want. The Wiki article summarizes the paper nicely, so I won't be paying your subscription. 
I wish I could gild you right now but I had to pay everyone today.
A 30 year old guy in the next block jumped of 11th floor, apparently was depressed, feeling lonely. Depressed the fuck out of me and my family. My grandmother is sick and my mom and aunt are absolutely tired of taking care of her for 6 months. Last year was filled with death, 3 other elder relatives have died.  Since the finals I have been feeling really lonely again, I made huge progress, I don't exactly have much anxiety anymore besides for presentations (failed the class a 2nd time this year, I don't know how I'll pass it actually). Been very outgoing, was getting called to football matches every week. But with winter I feel like I have been forgotten, and while I don't get much anxiety, after every interaction I have to worry about if I did/say something stupid. I also feel like while people hang out with me, I am not really ''good friends'' with any of them. I have no friends who I can actually open up to, partly also because I think it'd be embarrassing to say that I basically had no life for the entire high school years.  Played ''Life is Strange'' just today, I think those of you who like games would like it a lot. I felt like Max is kind of similar to us. And a bit similar to me.   Even though this is a throw away I have doubts clicking save.  So tired of acting happy while I have to spend time everyday worrying about my future, what jobs I will take, if anyone will ever love me, if I'll end up like Mr Duffy in ''A Painful Case''.
#### [other discussions (2)](/r/POLITIC/duplicates/2ucns6/ppar_attempting_to_create_a_hydra_bay_following/)   * [/r/geekdays 1 points 0 comments](/r/geekdays/comments/2ud3x2/let_a_thousand_pirate_bays_blossom/)   * [/r/PirateParty 3 points 0 comments](/r/PirateParty/comments/2ucfyf/ppar_attempting_to_create_a_hydra_bay_following/)
Yes this is me. I get too inside my head sometimes and stress myself out.   I've found the best thing for me to do is to try to take a step back and clear my thoughts then come back to whatever was bothering me. 
If that's the case, what other way would you like feminist to help support men? (Serious question)  I'd also like to say that feminism supports all genders, not just males and females. And people often forget that. 
Not that. But 3a switch and no mosfet or fuses...or a $2 volt meter...smh...what is the point?
My family three generations back was from a small fishing village in Norway a few dozen kilometers above the Arctic Circle.  There is a reason we are from a village a few dozen kilometers above the Arctice Circle... Du har en härlig land . För din hälsa och varmt väder !
Yeah I know... Sigh. 
Is that Amanda from D4?
Frist of all, how DARE yo u for suggesting this is fake.
Yeah hope to see you there :)
Id love to. Pm me 
Oh, absolutely. I'm a feminist myself. I just think it's funny how people think any conversation that implies women should be treated like human beings equates to the most radical of feminist ideas.  "I don't think a positive character on TV should call women degrading names." "OMG WHAT IS THIS RADICAL, MAN-HATING FEMINISM???? WHAT IS THIS POLITICAL CORRECTNESS?"   Meh.
thank you! I will definitely read this
Picking into an unfavorable matchup is one thing--disrespecting the stronger botlane and taking bad trades is another.  For example, a Vayne against a Caitlyn of the skill level cannot win lane, and if Vayne  gets cocky and tries to go in for dangerous farm or trade/outplay early, she will get chunked and poked out of lane. You have to recognize this and stay back and let Vayne's scaling do its work.  I think Piglet played terribly and was way too cocky. You can stay even or fall a little behind as Sivir when playing vs Kallista if you just stay back and try not to trade (playing safe). But as you saw, Piglet tried to go up for CS that was out of his zone, or tried to harass/trade, prompting Sneaky to dodge and beat Piglet down with autos and Rend stacks. He disrespected the 1v2 situation when Xpecial left lane and got chunked. He disrespected Annie support's all in zone from the bush again when he was alone and died for it. He picked cleanse, an extremely sub-optimal spell in most situations, and did not even make use of it. He played terribly and there's no excuse. It was Piglet playing badly, not the matchup or their focus onto him.  TL;DR: Don't downplay Piglet's shitty play, it is all on him. Even with the focus comp of C9 and their favorable botlane matchup, there are ways to play safe in order to avoid giving them the huge advantage that they got. He was too cocky. 
I sat through a full theater viewing. Not a single laugh in the room. Mostly the occasional groan here and there during a particularly painful scene. It's amazing how they managed to miss the mark on every single scene.
Noooooo  Does it still blow up fields of thrall like NM?
Cool, thanks for the recommendation
Bully.
Mmmmn, that was the best.
What amp and what pedals?
If Conan made the same joke about Jehovah's Witnesses or something, no one would give a shit.   Literally every religion (or even lack of religion) gets made fun of, but Muslims are untouchable.
So the way the backgrounds work is that it makes sure they fill the whole screen. If it's too small it upscales and if it's too large it crops. It always maintains aspect ratio. I can try to see if there is a way to make it downscale instead of cropping, but I don't think there is a simple solution using pure css.   Aside from that I would have to choose a smaller version of the image to begin with. I went with the biggest size since that would support the most screens without having to upscale.  edit: sorry, let me correct that. It is currently downscaling to fit the width. It is cutting off the top and bottom because the image has a fairly square aspect ratio. On my screen at least I still see a decent amount of both light and dark.
Happy to be back! And who doesn't love a bit of science?!
I highly doubt it was prerendered, they showed live footage of the game and it bazzled a lot of people because of how good the graphics were(it was running on a PC).  The reason the game ultimately looked like shit, was the fact that Ubisoft decided to not make the consoles look so bad in comparison to the PC(probably a deal with MS or Sony), so what they did was tone down the graphics on the PC. If you still don't believe me, there is a guide somewhere that guides you to making the game sorta look like the E3 graphics, which it does by enabling some hidden assets in the game files.
Scotty. Cameron. 
I have the feeling that there are going to be major lolz to be had in a little while when the site comes back up.  I think that they have been planning something Tres Magnific for a while now.
Ok dude its a TV channel. It's a big TV channel. There are thousands of TV channels. There are hundreds of big TV channels. It's not a huge presence in the collective consciousness. Its funny to make fun of their bright colors and flashy graphics. Their sounds are loud (not to mention their obnoxious hosts) but most people realize how stupid they are. Old farts in trailer parks might not realize it but really, how influential are they?
I dont know if this is the route you want to take but if you join the US Military as an analyst you're guaranteed a Top Secret clearance. Also since you have your degree you can enlist as and E-4 or commission as an Intelligence Officer.
If you're into feet, there's lots of em.
no its from this reddit story that blew up, where the two women characters were named jenny and carly 
Actually, he would have gotten away with it if he just hadn't grabbed her arm.  Saying racist things is protected by free speech.  However, the unwanted grabbing of her arm combined with his motives (as demonstrated by his racist comments) made this a hate crime. 
I occasionally do. I don't really sit and ponder scenarios but I used to carry one to arm my friend in case shit popped off, he had a carry license but his sig was getting some custom work done somewhere.  I still do it sometimes because why not? 
Timeless Ivy?
Oh those look quite nice 
&gt; I learned to laugh at my fainting and random bleedings. At least it changes up the routine a little bit.  I really like your optimism!
And:  &gt; The Tar Heel state comes in at **No. 37** for highest income for the top 1%.  I think our first digit must be a typo. $428K maybe?
what map was kabum-denial on?  I'm going mid elevate
No context title. Hivemind comments talking Shit. Yep, /worldnews
They consider it "lowbrow" entertainment.  I love Brooker and his shows in general but he and they have a habit of mocking shows they consider beneath them.  Brookers entire series "Dead Set" is his less than approving commentary about the at the time wildly popular Big Brother tv series and its viewers.
Sure. Feminists believe a lot of things. Many non-feminists believe that it's not harmful, though. 
Of course. Robot chicken, mad magazine, Saturday night live... It goes on and on. You can't palm something off as the original product-it needs to be clear to the consumer that it is parody. In this exact case, it's all academic since i'm not making a dime off the cartoon. 
&gt;Please load sheet in auto sheet feeder.  That mechanical voice from the 90's will haunt me to the end of days.  And coming out of an old pair of dell speakers it sounds more like shit than sheet.
So happy that you liked it. I always enjoy reading your scripts, most of them are on my to-do list. :)
LOL
Beer, beer, beer, beer.
But this is Trieste. A lot of bullshit went down there both before and after the war ended, basically between ethnic Slovene partisans, who tended to be pro-Tito communists, and fascist collaborators both Italian and ethnic Slovene. Who was the group that planted the bomb and who was singled out to hang and why? What scores were being settled?
DooriYoo 32 Hunter
Just be with me. 
If you've taken public transportation for 3 hours a day since middle school, snow gets old pretty fast  and i guess i did too
In this instance, we're simply debating (along with everyone else) the choices made in this specific situation.  You're also attempting to argue the fact that beliefs should be stood for - which I've already agreed upon.  Please, do not confuse the generality of your statement with the specifics of this case - the two are very different, and I explicity made that clear in my initial response to you.  In the end, as OP saw, the conditions were not ultimately worth his expression.
Send me his PI and I'll make sure that never happens again...k?
This should be in /r/aww . So fucking *cute*
Yeah that's the best I could get it's facing the other way lol
I'm not. But congratulations!
10 year anniversary of the /gquit joke. Much like the 23rd anniversary of the alt+f4 joke.
whoa whoa whoa, the bigger story.   A guy named Kuhn was rooting against the Packers?!
I have a hard time getting a really good score, because every time I destroy a molecule, the minigame freezes for a brief moment (Like a 3rd of a second) then jumps forward. Anyone else getting that?
What I hate is when you call out "on your left" and the runner immediately darts to their left.  It's almost better to not call but find your opportunity to pass and adjust your pace accordingly. 
Plot Twist:  OP Delivers!  TIL
Thank you, Linux is so diverse. 
Stop trying to be acute
Read my other post where I mentioned he used this house as a dropchest location for liddledums. Which is why he rumaged through my chests as well.  And yes, it could have been someone else who broke the reinforcements. We're not bountying for the breaks, we're bountying for stuff being missing AFTER liddledums entered those chests.
Eep. This all sounds a little bit self-indulgent on his part.  My advice would be to tell him straight up that you'd much rather the heirloom ring than a ring he makes you (and only because you've been expecting and waiting on it for the last 15 years). Be adamant about this. Be really blunt or you are going to end up with the hand-made holey ring and it will be too late.  Additionally, you might get a good response to this question on /r/relationships.
The part where I have to give Hasbro major kudos is that they told the MLP writers "we need human ponies! In high school!" And then they *got out of the writers' way* and let them interpret that how they wanted to without much meddling.  They could have just made some totally pointless parallel-universe movie with no connection to Equestria whatsoever beyond the names and colours of the characters, after all. That's all you need to sell toys. Instead they took the opportunity to weave it into the lore of the larger setting, and the setting was IMO enriched in the process.
Sigh 2013 that is so sad 
Have this as my message tone on phone.
Practice on 3rd tones followed by a 2nd tone, they are pronounced a bit special, ex: 以前 and 旅行. The 3rd tone is starting very low and quickly just go directly to the 2nd tone upwards from there.
I'm pretty bitter about having played the league cup against Liverpool days before what could have been a decisive game in the season. Lost 3 key players to injury and suspension because of the mickey mouse cup when we were expecting to walk this game if we had had Fab and Costa, but I guess England's darling team can get away with that.
I knew I was an adult the day the judge said, we're trying you as an adult.
We aren't going anywhere. As you can see we are just getting bigger and bigger. You aren't going to be a happy lad in twenty years. I stand corrected with the term amnesty but I do not agree with the negative connotations that you apply to it. I believe that any country that positively benefits from someone and doesn't want to make sure they are better taken care of is wrong and unethical. This country is built on immigrants undocumented or not this country has benefited from their hard work. 
WHY DO PEOPLE DOWNVOTE JUST BECAUSE SOMEONE SHARES HIS OPINION WHICH MAY BE NEGATIVE OVER THE SUBJECT, IT CLEARLY SAYS **NOT A DISAGREE BUTTON**
Hi! I have an egg with your TSV  2,4 - Eevee (M) - Modest - Anticipation - 31.05.31.31.31.31 [1545]  Any way you could help me out? :)
Israel wants a strong ISIS. It helps destabilize the region which Israel sees as good for their security.
Walking into those cheese shops is intimidating as hell.  
Your comment can be summarized by recommending we start ignoring actual educated economists and instead listen to angry people on the Internet whose economic philosophy is straight out of the 18th century.
Having no wisdom teeth is a plus.
go hybrid blood magic
I somehow know how you feel.   I want a shiny Charizard, and I keep sawing shinies from this family everywhere. :/
My newest setup!  Minimal and elegant, there are no window borders, very few colours and no bloat.  AHK to remove borders. BBlean for context menu Cygwin and Nano for text editor Custom Firefox CSS &lt;3
You wat. so you're saying people with modded controllers don't have an advantage on console? saying different keyboards and mouses gives people advantages is not a good comparison when all of what you're saying happens on console in a similar way.
In the UK maybe, she is queen of a lot more than just the UK though, and her power in many other nations is still very real and can (or rather in Australia at least, has) been used. 
"Really? I thought I suck"
It looks like the dude is telling his horse, "Hey man, check it out; giant head."
Youre about 12 years late to the party, but I suggest googling wc iii strategies for blizzards official strategy site.
The media has been telling me since I was a child that all unions are bad.   Today's police unions *are* too powerful  I cannot speak for all the labor unions that caused the whole unions are bad thing but if it weren't for unions we would not have the 40 hour work week, 8 hour day, and other basic labor rights. I think it may have been the auto workers unions that fucked it up for everyone. But the American people have been told that unions are bad, and in my case I have been hearing it since before I even knew what they were.  As I have gotten older I now see the need for them while also understanding that they have the potential to become monsters with their own agendas.  Like many things in life,  it is complicated and I don't know enough say beyond what I have.   The subject is seems taboo in America and it's weird to me that that is the case. 
probably not but hey let's see what happens weeee!
Wait, this is an actual show?
added for feeva thanks
Didn't realize their stats can go up, makes sense!
Anecdotes are amazing, huh? Just like how there is a little 6 year old girl who lives in my neighborhood who was bitten in the face by a beagle last year. I moved in after it happened, and every time she she's us walking our two pit mixes she runs up for a good face licking.   Nothing is absolute.
DotA2 item system covjek smislio
1: $60 2: 60ml subscription. 3: $45 w/ coupon, $30 w/o.  4: that's actually very nice. Thank you for the coupon.
Jihad a chance and he took it
It was mostly flatland, but it was amazing. We came home and had quesadillas with black olives and steak. We'll probably go out again tonight.
It's evening now, but... Morning! The cold weather is a killer for me, too. Every run is a struggle between using the treadmill (which I hate) and running in the cold (which I hate). What do you mean when you say you never learned how to run in sets?
#FirstBlood
Dennis Nilson was terrified of himself. He would get sick and vomit whenever he was disposing of bodies. Yet he did it like 12 times...
In any large crowd situation my plan has always been to use my pistol to get my and my family to the exit.
OG Walkman .. 32 Hunter
He just understands comedic timing.
Epsilon were well known to be unprofessional even before this episode, i.e. forfeiting in order to make CSGO Lounge cancel the match and then bragging about it later on Twitter
&gt; The same goes with resistance to shifting to driving on the right, etc.  Does any sane person think this can be done, at this point in time?   Imagine how many people would die in the conversion.
Easy, put it on top of a [Buick](http://i.imgur.com/8WM1cxD.jpg)
In medicine, you have to be top of your class. Are you telling me that class rank matters less in engineering? I'm going to look more into petroleum enengineering. Thanks.
That of a spoiled house pet.
Hey are you still up for the defog scyther trade? Sorry about all the delays earlier, there won't be those problems again.
Much bigger. That doesn't look comfortable at all.
Assad is a bad man. Not as bad, but pretty bad. He was secular, but a dictator. 
Montana... Too many pedophiles. After visiting there several times, I've come to realize they're a disgusting, inbred state, worse than visiting Memphis. 
I used to want to.
That sounds like my boyfriend! His dad and mom are short and he's 6'2". Then I'm 5'2"... :(
Crayons! D:&lt;
yo pienso que no se debería contestar a todas esas cuestiones. No contestar y punto.
And they'll all be direct by men. Femxploitation!
All good, yes.  It's just you see horror stories on reddit all the time about "poopsplosions" and whatnot.  A lot of people do it all wrong I guess.
*Longboard
No kidding. It's almost a red flag when someone wants to hook up or go out on a date immediately or the same day. 9/10 they dont have a job. That one that's left happens to have a day off work. 
Xavier is what I named my Metagross. (Both Psychic, smart, powerful, and made up of steel if you count his wheelchair. Plus Metagross has an X).  Duster for male Minccino (reference to minccino's cleaning habits)  Cuddles- Male Ferrothorn  Froyone (Frozen Yogurt + Frozone) for Vanilluxe  Cadence- Altaria (F)
An interesting point! He's excellent in NHL 14, but I hear quite differently from Toronto fans
I blame our cisgamy society that wouldn't let him marry both.
I had an IQ test done, but grad students administered it and it was considered a learning opportunity for them.  I didn't get to find out my score, but I felt not very smart by the end of it.  They asked me so many questions and it took like 2 hrs.  Some of the questions they asked were subjects i'm not good at and I couldn't even answer the question.  All of the shapes and spacial stuff I did great at, it was more the general knowledge stuff that wasn't my forte if it was a subject I wasn't very good at (history).  I'm not sure I want to know what my IQ is after that experience.
Sandalwood?
I used to run a full water cooling system back in the day (like 2007).  Water cooled the RAM, 4 HDD's, CPU, North Bridge, and GPU...  That was a serious pain in the ass.  Now that water cooling parts are more common it may well be easier to do. I still have that case, and full setup in my garage.   I keep thinking I'll rebuild it... and then I keep remembering to hell with that hassle.
How come its just one glove?
Deposited a lvl 13 male Plusle.   IGN is Ryan.   Thanks Amy!   I would love a n icy snow this time!   Thanks!
yes so it fits the chocolate
Irony: parents die at age 95 in a house fire.
I think I'm going to go Vegan now.
I'll bet you're a lot of fun to shop with.
Hab my bbies kvin &lt;3
I am currently proposing a trade.
Ar trebui să ne mutăm noi acolo. Mănăstirea Circlejerka, sau ceva de genul. Eu zic că am fi nişte călugări model.
Where do you live? Its been snowing all day off and on in Spokane.
U mad?  trolled.jpg
When trying to get friends of mine into Always Sunny, I'll just show them Lethal Weapon 5. I think the whole thing captures the idea of the show perfectly.
3817
I think a lot of folks are looking at this a little too narrowly, in that the thinking is that the whole shitfest that was the War of the Five Kings could have been avoided is Ned would have done things differently.  We need to look past a few permutations of subsequent events in order to view this:  LF's help vs. Renly's help: First thing I have to say about this is that Cat, who Ned trusts and loves as his wife, vouches for him.  Ned seemed to have his reservations, but he deferred to her thoughts on the matter, which was a mistake, as we all found out.  Let's see what happens if instead of accepting LF's help, he accepts Renly's.  Renly wants the crown, that's why he's offering Ned his support.  If Ned accepts, he's backing Renly's claim.  Amongst the people who have knowledge of the children's true parentage, who has the *best* claim? The Fucking Mannis, that's who.  Stannis has sort of been MIA for a long time; he, along with Jon Arryn, knew things.  Why go MIA? To prepare for certain eventualities, in this case, Robert's death.  Stannis was readying for the inevitable war that was about to ensue at the precise moment Robert died.  So by accepting Renly's help and backing his claim, Ned is basically giving the finger to Stannis and saying "come at me, bro."  This would even be the inevitable outcome if he served as Regent for Joffrey as well.  Then we come to the Lannisters:  Assume Ned backs Renly.  In addition to Stannis getting pissed, the Lannisters are also pissed, since Ned is coming out and saying "You know the kids that are in line for the throne?  Yeah, they're the product of incest between the Queen and her bro."  This would not go over well.  Cersei would either have to be killed or flee, and any way you look at it, there's gonna be war with the Lannisters in addition to The Fucking Mannis. Now assume he backs Joffrey as Regent.  Best case is he still gets embroiled in the middle of a massive war between Lannister and Stannis, with the addition of Renly thrown in there as well.  With him involved, the North will have to become involved in some fashion, so war is still gonna tear up the realm.  FURTHERMORE:  He knows the truth about Joffrey and siblings.  Other people who know this know that he knows.  Some of these people are actively plotting to get a Dragon back on the throne.  He's a wildcard.  The knowledge he has can make him an ally to some, and an enemy to others, and whichever he chooses for allies, the others will most certainly be enemies.  So suppose he survives the inevitable war; either the Baratheons are defeated, or the Lannisters are.  The realm is weakened, and when a Dragon inevitably returns, he's stuck in the middle of that, as he'll either be Hand or Regent (unless he's dead, which, yeah...).  Bottom line: The second Ned accepting becoming Hand, he was fucked, the realm was fucked, his family was fucked, everything was fucking fucked.  Hell, even if he didn't accept, everything probably would have still been fucked.  Moral of the story:  Everything is fucked.  The Game of Thrones is fucked.  The Long Night is coming, and all the scheming and killing will be for nothing as the realm will be torn asunder by Ice and Fire regardless.
Does Bubba Ray come back again, too?  Please?
Not everyone who flies drones are idiots.  Of course basically all of the ones that actually follow FAA guidelines don't need to be told that they shouldn't fly over a massive crowd in the first place.
I won't say I'd watch it again, but it's a few kids (with a lot more singing talent than I have) having fun.  Hate to say it, but bro, pick on someone your own age (unless you're also 10)
That track is unreal...like all his others. 
Thank god I'm not the only one
These are some good points. I feel like capping the damage out though would be a bit of a nerf. Capping the damage for monsters or the scaling idea probably wouldn't impact her too much, however, and would still allow the jungler to do his jungle thang.
My neighbors dog was innocent until it climbed over my fence and latched himself on my dogs neck.
Inquiring Minds podcast has a good amount of material dealing with identity and politics. Research reflects that conservatives have an overall innately fear based view of the world that informs their political opinions and biases, etc.  Stuff like that.
Well there you have it folks; sound criticism. 
Wait, why would my post have been removed? IIRC, she just deleted her own post from that thread.
Yeah I've noticed that quick replies for SMS don't work anymore. FB messenger works, but SMS (whatever the app) fails :(
&gt;What about when you're not talking to them though?  You're still challenging the identity of an entire class of people, whether the specific person that you're referring to is there or not.  &gt; Do you always refer to the pope as his holiness?  No, but I use the other common names for him.  I don't tell people that there's nothing holy about him or contradict that title in some other way when it's not appropriate.  &gt;And if I insisted that 'you' is not an acceptable pronoun for me, but I would rather 'johrim' instead of 'you' or 'johrouer' instead of 'your', would you entertain that request, simply because identify differently?  Sure.  I'd ask why, because I'd be curious, but it's not my decision to make.  Where does "johrim" even come from, and what does it mean?  I understand how an agender identity could occur and what it means, as there's biological precedent, but I don't even know what the root of your pronouns are.  The bigger question is, why do you care so much?  Is there some sanctity that you see in the gender dichotomy that I'm not aware of?  Why challenge a part of someone's identity that has no real negative repercussions?
ITT: people that don't know what a pitbull is.
Is Sony is able to name droo Dr. Strange why can't MCU at least drop a hint at Spiderman
13/f/US
Why haven't we seen darkseer for so long?  He's still a really strong offlaner, wall is great (and counters jugg a bit) etc.  Is it just because mass aoe is less popular?
Have you read the Quran? 
sorry! My web provided was having issues so I couldn't check reddit let alone go online &gt;&lt;"
We all have our share of idiots, including us. It's unfortunate in that they are usually the ones who seem to refresh + post the most.
Ofcourse fracking causes earthquakes. You're injecting high pressured mud into the ground in the hopes of cracking the rock to create pathways for the oil to come out.  You really think forcing the rock to crack apart under the high stresses it's at in depth won't cause disturbances?  Earthquakes are propagations of energy. Fracking will cause earthquakes 100% of the time. However most of them are tiny releases of energy. Every once in a while you get one that's actually detectable by everyday people on the surface.  Freak accident nothing more. Don't blame the people extracting it. They wouldn't have their jobs were it not for our society. They are simply there because people demand it. 
I don't have a basket with flow options.  Should i consider buying one?
The newspaper notes that Gaa was released from the Nodaway County Jail on $4,900 bond
Hey my friend. I'm not sure if I can help or not, I am a little broke myself. But I'm thinking it would help if you could post a link or 2 to a few specific shoes on Amazon or wherever, which would work for you. Especially since I'm not sure what qualifies as slip resistant. Just an idea :) By the way I live near Edison nj if you happen to be Round this area feel free to pm me if you wish.
Did you just assault me?
ACK. I didn't watch episode 4 yet. You just RUINED the season for me!!!1  ^^^^^^But ^^^^^^srsly ^^^^^^spoiler ^^^^^^tag ^^^^^^pls.
Bill fucking Murrayyyy
MGMT - Electric Feel
This I agree with completely!
Perfection.
Oof. That's heavy. I hadn't looked at it like that. Definitely makes me think about contributing to something outside of myself, cause I don't know how else to face my mortality.
This made me laugh.
I said Shanghai as a hypothetical. I wasn't talking about you, I was talking about a random person from China that I would have to agree with the same government on.   Many cultures are incompatible with others, and there is just too much distance to cover. I can't agree with how to run a country with someone from Mississippi, let alone on the other side of the planet. It's idealistic as hell man and I haven't been a college freshman since 2011.
Also, if you cut the bag the right way the milk comes out as a spiral.  
You should take another look at the complete guide then, if you think that. It's not only about querying other players. That is in fact only a very little part of that guide. First and foremost I wrote it so it's documented for future use. So it might be useless for you (just because you can't query that specific player you want), but for others it can save tons of time.  Edit: Also, i just randomly queried members of my [crew's roster](https://docs.google.com/spreadsheets/d/1VW2NIzCayNsAIFHpQv5bcmstwYjQdfIUQ3vHOTRwBjs/edit#gid=158346847). My success rate is more than 50%.
* Tina Fey  * Rashida Jones  * Emma Stone  * Aisha Tyler
Why is she boasting? I thought all orangutans were supposed to be able to climb 
*YFU-High-Five* :D I was in Japan on exchange about 5 years ago :)
IGN: Amber   Pokemon: Lvl 1 male Purrloin
I don't see it. Maybe he was spinning around saying "Oooooooh This is mine, that's mine, ooh shiny thing"?
Stats, live-ish game scores, standings and what-not are on Cevo. Here are the standings: http://cevo.com/event/clutchcon/standings/
i think im leaving it in mailbox purgatory. im not ready to admit my massive love of phallus
Eduardo Saverin
This so much. I used to get nervous before every flight but as you get more experience flying you realize it's just a series of things to conquer and you become (hopefully not over-) confident. First it's your first landing, then your first solo,  first spin, etc. I think doing accelerated stalls when I first started would have scared the hell out of me, now as a 200ish hour pilot they're fun as hell.
It was a joke referring to something going around on 4chan at the moment. Sorry.  My biking started with my parents being against it (bikes are for nutcases) then they bought me an old banger to play with, and it went from there.  Edit: What's their reasoning btw?
I was going to say. She looks like Genesis Rodriguez if she were hippie-fied
Because there'll be another two idiots to replace them.
I am autocorrect's bitch.
YOU FORGOT CAPS BITCH BOY
 "10 years (before 1964) is a lot more than a few years (before 1964)."  Which just further proves his point that we aren't so far removed from that time.
Probably that sound a radio makes when it's between stations. 
hey thanks
totally fair, just messin around because she's my favorite female MC as well
I can't do vodka anymore, lol. Beer is where it's at.
Haha - I just about remember those dark days. I used to live on Kwik Save noodles that cost no more than 10p a pack.   Kwik Save was a god send. Lidl looks posh compared to what it used it be like.
nah just looks sick. ^^^^^sarcasm
That's more of an eventuality than a possibility, thankfully. :) 
Live from my room, it's Saturday Night Live
Calling arabic women with Burka "potatoe bags" and depicting all muslims as arabs prone to rape and terrorism is fine because they made fun of a fascist party?
4462
I think you'll find that's not James Grime, but rather a sweaty, lantern-jawed, cigar-chompin', Yankee sub driver. They are the only ones qualified to handle Enigma machines...
You will get a better salary working abroad, especially when you consider the cost of living. I did mine in HCMC, Vietnam and a lot of the people were hired by the school.   Really it is up to you, but getting into debt for an industry that (I'm assuming)  you haven't worked in before is not the best start. And I say this without any prejudice, but there is no guarantee that you will pass (about 5% of candidates either fail or do not complete the course).   What are the language schools paying? Sometimes I think about coming home to work, but every ad I see seems to be paying pittance.
No questions asked?  I think you should be put down.
Because, excepting certain conditions we know not to obtain here, there's nothing that makes incest morally wrong. 
Huuughe tradeoff tibbers does a hefty amount of damage now that also gets resistances.
On mobile atm, but there's a Facebook page made for that. Trackmania Carskins was the one I think
yes, "someone" actually took the stage name Q Tip. That someone being a member and producer of one of the most influential and acclaimed hip hop groups of all time. It's a great stage name. 
Well, it what way does it increase the caster level? Do I just get a +1 to DC? 
My bold prediction:  Packers come back strong. The loss has made them angry, very angry.  The offense comes back better than before, emboldened by the resigning of Cobb and the development of Adams and Rodgers into all star position players.  The defense comes out in post season form; and to the rest of the league's horror, Mathews and Peppers now know how to play together perfectly complimenting the others play style.
cool-not trying to be a goof its just Ive read all your post and e-book and this was the first I didnt understand. Thanks for taking time to clarify for me.
Right there with you.  The Shots gods are cruel
ANyone know the price of the adapter in Japan? I want Amiibus on Sm4sh 3DS.
Ey do you want anything from [here](https://docs.google.com/spreadsheets/d/1XAeJQitWPZOK9A2yOqoRa8_ecLp1ohI-MU-aUACSWeo/edit?usp=sharing) for vivs/torchics?
Thanks so much! :)
psn turtle023 
Also you didn't actually get back to me about what kind of ice you wanted. Pure Ice, Packed Ice, or Ice? 
Stopped reading after I read the title on here.
"Make sure you kiss your knuckles before you punch me in the face."  So good. 
well if you need space bad just kill off vagabonds, those are easy to come by since they are 2*. I maxed my vagabond from vagas I collected after I got my darion. 
Vaccinate all the cows!
"made a comment saying i'm ugly to crush trying to get a complement"* FTFY
This destroyed me
&gt;  Comments that objectify people are not allowed. Joking or not, asking for pictures, hitting on people, etc, are not welcome here.
I guess my fear on Cobb is that he can't/won't stay healthy. He hasn't managed it the last two years. They say past injury is the best predictor of future injuries. I know that one injury was of a freak nature but I'm scared to have him on my DL for half the year again. I know that every pitcher is a time bomb and all but Cobb "burned" me before. I also think Stroman is going to be on the better team than Cobb.   Seager isn't as sexy as Posey and his MVP and rings. But he is a damn good third baseman and 3rd is shallow compared to catcher. I can see that keeping one of the best at the position would hurt everyone else as much as it would help me. 
Imp's a popular fight to use Divine Purpose on. Since you spend a lot of time attacking two targets (Abberations) it's easy to get a lot more free cleave damage. That aside, when you can hit two targets, use holy power on Divine Storms when buffed - you shouldn't be relying solely on Divine Crusader procs. Keep swapping Judgement targets for Double Jeopardy, and to keep Censure on both. Don't pull out Hammer of the Righteous until there's Remnants out in P4, but definitely Storm on two targets. Other than that, sneak in as many Hammer of Wraths as you can on adds as they go down, and you should be fine.
they are different names for the same group. Differing translations and political correct-ness give rise to different names
join /r/noses, my nasal appreciating brother
#asssophatneedalapdance
I've been seeing tabloids about them for months now, interesting to know it's not just a rumor. Not sure how a reality show about it would work though.
I know about the Heaven's Gate thing- it's really sad, and frankly odd. Watching their commander "Apple White" is scary, with him being bald, castrated, and always speaking slowly with extremely wide eyes. What's even creepier is that the guy who maintains the website was told not to kill himself so that he could keep up the website. So yeah. Regarding scp-wiki.net, I never heard about that. Really weird and creepy, who would put such dedication into something like that? Its insane.
Best. Pic. Ever.
I protect myself from theft by not having anything to steal.
It must have been directly under him to send him flying like that. The sound of a hand grenade can easily be drowned out by gunfire. 
"Who?" 
Maybe. I'll see if it changes over the next couple days. I know the vets in my area want the dog sedate for oral rads, and I don't want to spend that right now 
IMO, avoid the telescoping rods like the plague. After a long search (and a few returns) I ended up very happy with Bass Pro's microlite pack rod. Mine is a 3 piece 6' light power. Comes with a cloth wrap and lashes to a backpack easily. It's about $45, add on a cheap(ish) reel and you're set.   Edit: typo
&gt; questioning the status quo, showing hypocrisy, of humor, the spirit of rebellion against those in power  What?  Charlie Hebdo is the status quo.  Making fun of minorities races and religions is the matter of fact, not the outlier.  Charlie Hebdo doesn't care about free speech, they care about their speech, and have fired employees in the past for that employees speech.  Charlie Hebdo isn't rebellion against power but is a manifestation of power.
You didn't read it all :) Even in read only it reverts them on this patch. Last patch it did not though I agree.
If you really feel like you have no idea what you're doing, I'd suggest to sit down and watch a whooole bunch of tutorials!   You can [start here for example](https://www.youtube.com/playlist?list=PL37E8AB1374276BD7). She uses mostly really affordable drugstore products too. 
This past christmas, the SO and I were leaving this liquor store in a strip mall type place with like a wal mart, dollar tree, 5 below, game stop, you know the deal.  At the entrance and exit light there was a homeless guy pan handling.  We had seen him there often over the couple years we had lived in the area.  It was the week before Christmas, his cardboard sign always said homeless veteran, willing to work, please help kinda thing.  We would give him change or cigarettes fairly often, when we could.  Anyway, as we were pulling in, he was there, and in his usual spot, but this time he was crying.  Not like a tear from the cold but legitimately weeping.  People drove right on by.  I said to the SO, let's go to the store and we can give him something on the way out, I don't want to get stuck in here at rush hour, all the yada yada.  When we left, he wasn't there, and I haven't seen him since.  If I had stopped on the way in and maybe asked if he needed help or a ride or something, maybe it could have helped.  Still feel bad about it.  
Why do so many people drink powdered protein supplements to begin with?   It seems a bit excessive in regards to their actual protein requirements. A balanced diet would offer most people all the protein they need each day.  It seems that it's hugely fad driven.. people also love to talk about their goddamn protein shakes it seems. People and their giant tubs of protein on the kitchen counter, $400 blenders, letting everyone know they gotta get their protein.. because.. ready for this ... they lift weights!
Professional offendees 
ABATE at Red Rocks CC. It's about ten hours on the bike. Emergency braking, swerving, counter-balance. It definitely instilled in me some good reflexes. I highly recommend it.
I watched it for the first time this Xmas and I cried. I'm 34.
My desktop is on a floor above the router and my family will not approve of a cable like that *or* drilling holes. We have an old router, would turning it into a bridge and using Ethernet from that to my desktop cause higher latency or anything, or is AC the same as just using Ethernet?
Fuck TRU as a staff and a motheruckin crew. Who actually trusts those dates to stick? Those bastards cancelled my Lucario last month and the whole state of Alabama didn't do the preorder card things so I had to get it for 21.95 off of eBay.
How about Greenwald's site, https://firstlook.org/theintercept/
Yeah I've found out this isn't true, it's the opposite of /r/fatlogic  You just don't eat big amounts of food 
6 of Chalices: Changes are underway, though you may not see them yet. This month is going to be one of peace, positive change--promotion, new job, relocation? It has a hint of nostalgia. A trip home? Fondness, taking care of others and sharing your happiness with others. I'd say you're off to a great start!
Comcast outside of CSN
&gt; CDBOOT: Cannot boot from CD - Code: 5  Have a read here: http://www.unawave.de/windows-7-tipps/code5-error.html?lang=EN
I'm here!! I'm ready too!
Oss 
People told me to watch Breaking Bad immediately after I watched The Wire. To me, it was shockingly bad. I hated all of the characters, it seemed cheap and cheesy albeit the cinematography was gorgeous. That is the only show that people seem to regard as highly as The Wire and I couldn't stand it. You're probably right.   Now Mr. Pickles is a show I can get behind. 
Glad we think alike!
next year as in 2016? :O
Players playing Kalista does not equal doing well on Kalista, which DOES NOT equal playing well on a LCS level.  I'm confused. Are you making your very own unrelated point or an actual counter-argument? Anyways, if Kalista is the reason CLG wins vs TIP, then I'll concede to your point.
I did this on a snowmobile a week ago, me and another guy were sharing it, and switched whenever our group stopped, but we'd stop the engine in different ways (I usually used the switch, he used the key), and the starter was broken and it was hard to start it again, amazing we didn't flood it.
Honestly if I was that close and didn't have a Wii U, I'd just buy a 20 coin code from an eBay seller while they're still available. [This](http://www.ebay.ca/itm/Club-Nintendo-Codes-PINs-Coins-from-Nintendo-3DS-Wii-2015-CLEARANCE-SALE/291191972667?_trksid=p2050601.c100085.m2372&amp;_trkparms=aid%3D111001%26algo%3DREC.SEED%26ao%3D1%26asc%3D20140211132617%26meid%3D5813b79f1a2e42b39e0061c235daa46f%26pid%3D100085%26rk%3D1%26rkt%3D4%26sd%3D291191972667%26clkid%3D3757929862149386178&amp;_qi=RTM1963929) post has Wii Play for $1.95, 20 coins.  Then again, you still have two months. But the final rewards are going up any day now, and the only games that have codes are already available. So there is no new information to be had. If the rewards are good, those codes will go up in price, not down.
Coffee is a diuretic, makes you lose water.  Do you notice a correlation following drinking Coffee?   Edit:like the drink only spelled the same
Well, he didn't lose any arena orbs so my guess is he didn't fight him, or if he did he waited the full hour for the orb to come back.
Haha, good luck reaching that $100 limit to cash out.
Don't forget to put one or two girlfriends in the pictures for a karma multiplier.
Seeing my SO
I sang this entire thread. 
I'm available night time during your time
But we are playing Minnesota. 
that thong
What's wrong with them? I'm in a toss up between getting a second gigabyte 280x oc edition 3gb to crossfire, or getting a single asus strix 970 oc'ed
ain't even mad.
Your sens should be *somewhere* around 400 dpi/3.5 ingame.  If it's something ridiculous like 2000dpi/6, lower it.  Make sure you've mastered (or are well on your way) stutter stepping and controlling your recoil.  Deathmatch for aim practise every day; challenge yourself to get faster and more accurate.
i'm thirsty
he wrote the guide right? Magic Attack Up 3: I prefer using this on my wand in place of Ambush 3 if I don’t have an extra slot for it. I find that hitting people in the front works a little more effectively when you use Magic Attack Up 3 vs. just the Ambush Buff. And for the most part, 1 hitting people in the back is basically just as easy.
I am in Logan but I am planning on going on some weekend rides this year. 
Or...Magic: the Donuting
I did two things, I messed with gain settings which eliminated the desert of signals, and I also actually had a USB extension cable laying around with ferrite chokes on it. I added that, and now I am getting signals loud and clear! Thanks for all your help!
31 titan soboutitimcare max ghorn IB HoC Fatebringer
I have never used Pirate Bay and am a little scared to do so. Are there any precautions I would need to take before I go ahead and start?  Thank You.
Heil Jerry
*tips hat and smiles*
*Throwing garbage into a dormant volcano...would be useless as it may not erupt for hundreds or thousands or years.*  *"Putting waste into this volcano would destroy its natural beauty and appeal," says Simpson.*  Like I said...a boring answer, but I think that pretty much sums it up.  Even more boring, they probably just don't want him to fall in.
Before I moved to the city I always used Spothero
Dude members of his tribe carried that motherfucker by hand through downtown to Seattle Center.
You see the buckets of shit you threw on this thread right? Look back at all those comments you spent time nitpicking to get "them" back. Think real hard about the effort you put in just so you didn't have to post one comment to say your wrong. Wasted potential man.
I thought unit 00 was always such a good pilot because she didnt have a soul but had a weird subconscious craving to rejoin the whole tank of reis situation?  And as a result piloting Eva was like she was rejoining herself?  Either way excellent write up, I always struggle to explain the show easily, but there really isn't a way to. Fuckin magical show, I need to rewatch. Totally cried when the mass produced Eva's showed up :-(
Spend your splinters in random only before you get half of the roster or so. Taskmaster it´s one of the worst heroes in the game :)
Randy? 
done!
No that's not a good ideea just because of balance. If some characters will have the same abilities, but just reskin them is the same problems like other mobas have with items.  You can't nerf a character without making one useless after.  I mean look at Envenom maybe it was op on some characters but not on all characters. And so on. 
I wanted to keep it in box and have an International Lucario collection but now I don't know what to do... I'll probably open it since it's practically opened anyway, dunno if I'll get another in one to replace this one though. 
That's one of the best parts!
rated  here is my RMM: http://www.reddit.com/r/RateMyMayor/comments/2l1gim/k20a3/
...something something Tight Ends.
That lazy eye...
Byraminho
The way you've phrased your post makes me think that you don't have a lot of respect for your girlfriend and that you don't think she is very intelligent. The way you disparage her degree and her interests suggests you don't really see her as an equal.   Your girlfriend is not going to be a female clone of you - she is not going to match you in every aspect - physically, emotionally, intellectually, financially - whatever it is. And any other girl will not match you in every way, either. You need to decide whether you can love her exactly the way she is now, because she sounds like she is happy the way she is. You've been with her four years and she hasn't changed, it's unlikely you'll see a big change now. 
Do you go to germany for work, pleasure or family?
Exactly. It's actually pretty funny sometimes because they will learn something new and then do it better than the Quarian they learned it from.
So what you're saying is, it's ok to breach contracts as long as the other party doesn't figure it out?
I have the same thing. I have more down days than up. The up days feel great I actually feel like myself but the down days I just want to hibernate.
King Slice is the best pizza, but not the greatest for a date. 
depending on who's on...
if my background app refresh option is disabled....can facebook override this?
I was hoping Commander Holly would be on the list
Indiana, Steak 'n Shake
Or you could give them a big smile and just say 'no thanks'. 
You don't have to eat sandpaper when you're losing weight.  I genuinely enjoy all the food I eat whether cutting, bulking or in maintenance. Walking is far from a waste of time.  It's good for you mentally and physically, but most of your effort should be focused on diet.  Walking burns calories it's just that to burn an equivalent number of calories as higher intensity exercise you have to do it for longer but you'll burn the most with whatever you're most consistent with. 
Okay, but do you *honestly* think that Niantic would see this as anything other than cheating...?
Doesn't nidalee count she is a cougar... 
New co-worker (recent college graduate) asked if I was meeting "the group" for drinks Thursday afternoon.  When I told her I wasn't aware of the meet-up and asked who would be in attendance, she replied, "Oh, I'm not sure--I guess just a bunch of people my age".
This is the best thing ever. I feel bad Averman and Goldberg got left out. 
Wait. Kettle is a brand? I was talking about the style.
Group bossing would be an option, even fairly low level players can group up to do GWD. Generally, traditional gathering skills aren't good money in the game, but can be an option if you don't mind a ton of AFK.
The video is a must see.
I rely on people like you to enable my driving avoidance. Cheers!
Considering Harper's stance he seems to have taken on the enviroment by [destroying](http://thetyee.ca/News/2013/12/23/Canadian-Science-Libraries/) works of science I wouldn't put it past them to start arresting environmentalists protesting.  [another link](http://www.cbc.ca/news/politics/fisheries-and-oceans-library-closings-called-loss-to-science-1.2486171)
Well I guess it's inevitable that people would make judgments about them. Generally though, I don't make negative judgments.
Pharasing?
Forever
Nice!
Wow.  What a way to neuter that verse.
I can show you a screenshot, minecraft gives me an error when I even try to load the shader pack. I then crash.
Oh, you must be that one guy from the battle reptile gaming forums? 
Wait, I don't understand - is that article from before the show or what?
Oh. Why haven't I even thought about that? It's a good idea but how would it make sense for lifeforms to evolve simultaneously and reach similar tech levels? Even if life was common wouldn't it be a very low chance of these lifeforms developing simultaneously? 
that was so stupid of impact who does that 
Another solution for the future is to just not tell her anything.  Let her pick that or not freaking out.
&gt; Gaslighting is a recognized type of emotional abuse that isn't presented as exclusive to one sex.  It's turned into another magic word [to manipulate people with](http://imgur.com/BtwDB5q):  &gt; Now you're resulting to tone police?  &gt; You literally just gas lit me.  &gt; Because you're going to sit here and trigger me and act like I'm the problem...
Brothers: A Tale of Two Sons
it's a shame Mango is in prison though...
Question: Could the University fuck you if you just sent a link to a webpage with a downloadable .PDF to your class?
isn't that a good thing though, like no people are getting sick or no people have to be going out and kill each other
I tried really hard to make it seem possible in my mind. mmm not working LOL
A bit of a nip slip 
I have 80+ series and 380+ movies. Do have some anime as well. I'll swap shares if you want to give my stuff a look.  GaMEChld
I lost to petmaster 5-4
The problem with this is that the centre of the apple is where dirt, dust, and insect larvae collect. So you probably don't want to do it in the first place. 
1. /u/2008OL 2. Key for L4d2 4 Pack split 3. http://www.reddit.com/r/SteamGameSwap/comments/2u98he/h_battleblock_theater_castle_crashers_terraria/
For me it wasn't a hard decision. Season 3 sucked and season 4 was redeemed by the antagonist. In my mind nothing would be able to make the following seasons any good.
I have a few old friends who either fly for, or work as flight attendants. Interrupting the workings of a cabin is a big no no to them. They are the kings and queens during that flight. They do not put up with such things. If you had told them, they would have warned her to sit there are be quite. After which, when she "accidentally" spilled V8 on you, she would not be allowed back on board that airline for her return flight. 
No worries! My dad used to remake american revolution era clocks, all the mechanics, the woodwork, and the gold leaf.  It's not something that really anybody anywhere needs to care about, but there it was in my house, I remember him pointing it out, and helping him here and there. That google image search is a lot of digital clock clipart and such anyway, most people don't even like roman numerals on clock faces anymore or really care.  I'm sure there is someone at colonial williamsburgh or in charge of the american smithsonian of arts and crafts that could tell you for sure the history.  I actually just like blocky hash marks on the hours, personally, numbers aren't really needed at all.
"Yeah." 
I was pretty fine until I hit 23 and found out that not only are autoimmune diseases rampant in my family, but my body is showing symptoms for several of them. Not to mention depression running like the Mississippi through our family.   However, we *are* all pretty creative and artsy, and I take to crafty stuff pretty well, so I've got that going for me, which is nice. 
Fair enough... I definitely agree with you that a purely military "kill them all" response will not in itself be able to put an end this movement.
I've blown up 2 vehicles with foundations/platforms.
32 Titan Defender with maxed Gjallarhorn, Black Hammer, etc. Have experience.  Psn is Mordminnen
hi welcome to spoilers
Don't know why you're getting downvoted, your flair's completely true, he's gonna be a demon for us with the pace and quality we have fit in the side now!
&gt;eating right and exorcising  Because the fat needs to be exorcised
Surely there is some way to have a non coercive capitalist society? 
It's my b-earth day too!!
not really. the time i spent in the t6 and t7 was enjoyable and hardly frustrating, and now i have no need for either of them
http://i.imgur.com/HKuqSdx.gif
Not sure if serious, but he's saying he's isn't putting out for just aybody(''I'm not your Boy Toy''). It's the same as The Bellas ''You can look but you can't touch.'' He knows the girls want him but most of them only get to watch.
It's nice to see that rainbow gradient WordArt is still in style.
[Private Reserve Sepia](http://www.fountainpennetwork.com/forum/index.php/topic/217606-private-reserve-sepia/) is a well shading ink.
They do if I don't want my parents to kill me.
My night is done.
This. 
Thank you!!! I think thats what disturbed me the most. Judging by the patterns on the plate it looks like alot of these "snacks" were literally one after the other...
I can't answer why, but it's true for me as well, not just my Nexus 5 but my prior android HTC as well.  I use a blueant speaker for phone/navigation attached to my visor so I can hear it over the radio/CD/other device, but I can't be doing a podcast on my phone and also have nav.  I have no solution to the "silence the length of the navigation directions" problem. 
I won $12 on my 18th birthday. I think I used it to buy a pack of cigarettes (I dont smoke cigs). So I pretty much shortened my life my winning the lottery. 
What a mess..
[Pylon/Pyloff]( http://m.imgur.com/kIQcGPa)
Haha.  I know.  Sucks man.
Enjoy the downvotes, can't believe I wasted my time on this troll
Nothing a little science and a lot of money couldn't fix!
oops..  when my daughter first met Ariel, she hugged her and refused to let go.  had to drag her away
Triangle Shirtwaist, anyone?  I'd absolutely make a call to the fire department.  
I came here to say this or upvote someone saying this. I just saw Must Die last night and he played his new track as his intro, it's not a Take U There remix.
People need to as why ISIS exists in the first place. People don't just wake up one day and say that they want to kill people. Only asking this very basic question will help us quash these guys. I'm constantly amazed how inept the Western governments are in not addressing this simple obvious question.  Chickens always come home to roost  Edit: If you downvote, please provide an explanation. 
It may be a dumb mistake on her end, but at the end of the day there isn't no wiggle room, the dude should be executed for this shit. If she was clearly a threat to him (which we can clearly see she wasn't), he could had cuffed her the many times he had her pinned down. Cops should receive a harsh punishment like execution, they keep killing innocent civilians. 
There's not even a point for you to try anymore
Korean-American fan here who fanatically cheers on the United States and S.Korea at any given chance - both of my teams lost this week, but will admit..  This was the most entertaining game I have watched all season. Cheers, you Aussie bastards!
I dunno man, just speaking from what I've experienced. Driving from CA to Oklahoma and and I never saw a single hill once we left Nevada.  Kansas and Nebraska were the flattest.  But there was constant lightning storms, so that was awesome. We don't get those here.
Ok....NOW it's TIME!
I managed to get both MegaMan and Dedede after a few tries. Thanks guys!!!
Is there any sample implementation that can be used to test the algorithm?
http://intsports.net/str13.html  HD  Cavs Feed
No. If you want to have fun without spending so much at the clubs, visit Vegas during non holiday weekends.
Broad collar bones? Do you mean a wide chest?  
Also from PV:  Every player will get at least 30 minutes tonight.
Sure thing! Very quick and smooth, thanks for the giveaway!  Also very cool to give out a Garbodor :)
Tonight ends my Dry January!  I can finally join you all again!  Cheers.
&gt; I'll admit my computer skills are only those of someone who has grown up with them--I can work them and trouble-shoot most issues myself, but I know pretty much nothing when it comes to more complex things such as how compression works, file types, and so on.  And you shouldn't have to. Think how many officers are from the generation before ours. They're still fine officers and they should have an easy way to just drop it in and call it a day.  &gt; I'm looking to go into the AST myself within the next two years if everything works out, but I can only imagine what it will/does feel like to know your back-up is 200+ miles away.  Pass. Not for me, I'm afraid. I couldn't do LE work anyhow. Just the thought of dealing with drunks, addicts and desperate career criminals is too stressful for me.  &gt; I was talking about going back and reviewing footage for case follow-up. But I believe the AXON body camera system is set up exactly like that--hence their additional annual fee for that process as well.  Ah, the annual fee. Nice thing though is that it would have the officer's time-stamp, maybe even GPS stamping, and could easily be located as needed.  &gt; I will read your linked article when I get a moment; and I apologize if what I'm about to link you to is wrong due to anything you know or is written in that article. They are both fairly lengthy, so I understand if you quit half-way through.  You callin' me a quitter, bro? Just for that, I'm going to read them! (ha ha, sure showed him!)  The first link I actually read when it was fresh. The second one I hadn't seen, but it's still using uncompressed figures. Not uncompressed so much as not smart-compressed. Cameras are still quite a ways from doing that, but it's easily handled on the backend. Especially since it doesn't need to be done in real time and can be scheduled for times when server load is low.  Handling all officer data would be a big task, but it's already one that is feasible. Especially when you factor in the savings reaped by departments with already-bloated budgets for doing this, it wouldn't cost nearly as much as you might think.  I'm a moderator at /r/AskLEO and /r/leomemes if you'd like to swing by some time.
Or maybe you just aren't swole in the heart and mind, and think this is a joke.
get an intel and make sure he has an intel compatible motherboard.  then, later on he can get a 4690k.
But Young Link is broken AF.
and not for the first time i seem to recall some bullshit going on at the world cup many years ago.
7/10  10/10 with my glasses on
Yes
Unfortunately I also have anxiety and all I can think about while walking or running in the woods is someone murdering me while I'm alone.
jesus, nbome lasts like 14-16 hours, if mistaken for LSD (which is significantly shorter lasting) it can be a fucking tiring experence.  RC's on facebook, the lowest of low.  
Sat.
Smalls sold out the first night. I'll calculate the shipping price for you in a while 
Edit: I was reading this on mobile and wrote my response because I thought you included 'air in the Syria Campaign' which is why I wrote what I wrote.   Now I understand what you were saying. 
Hah. How's that working out for you?
Yea, down south here, the military throws on an extra $200 for food a month, a basic housing allowance that differes depending on grade and location(but if you live on base, it all gets taken out.) All of this is tax free.  Dont know the education programs, but theres a bunch of ones that the military will pay for in exchange for extra commitment, excluding our GI bill. 
I never let on to my parents that a motorcycle was even something I might possibly want until it was purchased and sitting in my garage, then I told them.  However I didn't ask forgiveness, I just told them what I purchased and that it was a done deal. I told them that it was something I had considered and contemplated for a long time and I finally decided it would be something I would always regret if I didn't do it.  They're still not at all fond of the idea, but they respect it. And really, they had no say in the matter one way or the other.
How is München pronounced?
Oof, what happened?
I was in Jr. High when my niece was born. She's graduating high school and going to college. Aaaaaaaaa
40 year old Let's Player? That's awesome! Glad to see you do volunteer work as well.  Pink Floyd is awesome! What's your favorite song?  Any pics of your stencil work?
[The "zebra camo" concept](http://image.motortrend.com/f/wot/2015-nissan-gt-r-nismo-spied-on-nurburgring-400851/59397436/2015-nissan-gt-r-nismo-spied-front-three-quarter-3.jpg) is very common when testing new car designs. I'm surprised we haven't seen it in F1 before. 
:-(  While it looks nice, that's much less impressive than max size doing this. We have a 3x3 of the max zoom level which is 12x12 at this size (not much larger area covered than yours, though.)  EDIT: Though I do like you put the alphanumeric key for location on it. :-)
https://youtube.com/?#/watch?v=pXkEO9UbLAQ
That's a little underwhelming although great for emulation rigs.
There are plenty of reasons.  1.  I used to work at a site where no PEDs (Personal Electronic Devices) were permitted.  Phones, laptops, MP3 players, and everything of the sort had to be stashed in a locker in the lobby before you were allowed in the building.  Yes, I still had a clock on my computer, but I wouldn't be at my desk all day.  2.  As people have said, battery life.  My phone has shocking battery life, and I use it heavily, reading stuff on my phone on the train to and from work.  It's not uncommon for it to die halfway through the day.  By contrast, my watch has a spring and a small swinging weight that winds it up when I swing my wrist.  As long as I wear it, it will literally never run out of power.  3.  I find my watch has a psychological impact on me, and it helps me work better.  Sure, it's a piece of jewellery in a sense, but it's also a nice reminder of the incessant passing of time.  I use my watch as a psychological anchor for work/play.  Right now, I'm messing around on reddit, so my watch is sitting on the table beside me.  In a few minutes, I'll put it back on, and go to work.  4.  A good watch is, in my opinion, the ultimate fusion of form and function.  Engineering and artistry brought together.  I'd much rather wear that than any other piece of jewellery.
Can slides up to fill for Stevie and Wisdom could play that rcb in a back 3.
I mentioned believers in the Christian God.  Believers in the Christian God believe in a creator by default. They are on that side of the argument...the one you claimed had found no answers, but in actuality has found pretty much every answer we have about the universe prior to the last 100 years.  This philosophy is as exclusionary of religious thought as religious thought tends to be about contradictory science. A person motivated to find proof of a creator could find answers as easily as one looking for proof that isn't one. 
Milhouse is not a meme.
Are the gay rights movement and feminism going hand in hand right now? Yes. If you read what I mentioned above...you'd understand that this partnership will not last.   No. I was not asking for your approval. I asked for opinions...not your stance on gay people.   Gay men might cancel out a few lesbians....sure...but that's better than nothing. Although estimates are hard to make.....lets just assume that 5% of men are gay.   That's 5% of the population that is immune to pussy power. That is 5% of the population that has EVERY REASON to resist a female dominated society.  You clearly did not read the post and instead are trying to paint me as a "victim begging for approval"...rather than a guy posting some unheard point of views.
The argument is that it's simpler, more consistent and looks nicer than the equivalent bash. I know when `[[` is required and when `[` or `test` is sufficient, but the average new user does not. Inheriting a bunch of bash scripts is far more daunting than a bunch of fish scripts if you have no prior shell scripting experience (just like inheriting a bunch of templated C++ code with little prior C++ experience).  Once you start needing some of the more advanced features of bash, you should probably rewrite it a real programming language anyway. At work, we've recently been switching most of our bash scripts to python for just this reason.  If you want to make something portable, you need to use Bourne Shell, which is quite a bit more restricted. I've given up trying to make portable shell scripts, so now I either write in fish (for simple scripts) or python (for things that need to be portable).
Same thing happened to [Kam Chancellor 2 years back](https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=78qF72JwJwA). Led with his shoulder but I think the refs see the head snapping back and just assume the worst when you lay a guy out like that, especially when Green couldn't get up. Most guys can't knock a guy out with a clean hit, but most guys aren't hitting like Browner and Chancellor.
I saw a therapist for years and it didn't help the depression and anxiety. It helped with the shame and self-loathing, which made it quite worthwhile, but I think depression and anxiety are often organic. I have to take meds for those to avoid the living hell. Never been able to talk my way out of it. 
is that serperior female?
You'd think you can. But you cant, you can click a button but it doesnt do anything.
Yes, but he skips leg day. 
How much energy does 1 fan produce? Can I put one up in my house and cover ALL of my electrical needs?
&gt;as i see here that they blocked your accounts ,but they didn't ban your whatsappMD version again because it's ban proof   can something really be ban proof? 
Oh, jesus. I have to download a fucking excel spreadsheet to see the part list? Have you never heard of google docs? Really not helping your credibility here.
I know that was a joke, but all those NHL players did get the mumps this year.  The all ended up looking like Sloth from The Goonies.  It was a good flair bet!
How many Ryans do you know?
Young, high upside, can produce at a very high level, and is an RFA. 
Hi! Yes, I Can.   If you still interested i would be online a few hours!
Mine is called Balamb, from Balamb Garden in FF8.
Your rent is $300? The fuck? 
Right, but I noticed the website also says I used more minutes. Just odd.
why?
Tom Petty won't back down, he'll stand his ground. 
We will 
AirBNB a whole apartment for yourselves. blogto.com for restaurants and events.
Me, too. But then I thought about working the sauce up into a lather all over her body and declined to comment.
LOL!!!! Tell that to Egyptians!   The Egyptians, Israel, USA and many more sane countries know better than you.  What's next? We will just oppose the Nazi army, but support the civilian Nazi government? Same thing with N.Korea and Iran?
Id play Mid  ID - KoolAid
FOR THE HOARD!!
/r/nostalgia
I'm at rank 193 and I've never gotten a ronia...it's smooth sailing for you from here on out. I would recommend focusing on red sonia or meta as your main leaders.
I've been obsessed with Helen Mirren since OP posted originally.
Me too. I don't know what we did but we adjusted to at least box out and fight. It doesn't hurt that rozier is a beast on the glass as a guard
Where can I order one? I'm in Canada.
He doesn't want the booty, he wants to go home.
Such a sexy little body from such a cutie! !!
Klingande - Jubel   Faul, Wad Ad &amp; Pnau - Changes
People sell betas..
Oh god why the fuck did i watch that?
Ništa, gledao Fury s Bradom Pittom... šteta što se potresi još ne mogu predvidjeti dovoljno unaprijed da probam sinhronizirati akcijske scene s trešenjem...
As a general manager i can honestly say that they can get away with it. Changing job codes requires different pay rate. I know because district manager often would tell you to change job codes to some people to lower their wages. my advice is to ask for a transfer to a location that needs a manager depending on how long you were a manager they might let you to transfer. 
Damn it! Now you have me refreshing the rewards page (Midnight UK here)
Reminds me of Halloween in 1996
That is a recipe for INSANE latency.
Alternatively:  Name should rhyme
This is the kindest thing you could say...and I appreciate reading your advice. In short, I like you.
[So fucking hard...](http://imgur.com/5e7IOpx) that it's too late this time.. if a grab for the cam I might accidently shoot the load.
The story says the entire event unfolded within seconds or at the very least, a minute or two.  Many parents would have some sort of negative reaction at porn on the girl's computer.  I've always felt that easy-to-open windows in a 14th floor high rise is a recipe for disaster in raising adolescents, Russia or elsewhere.  Or toddlers.  Or young kids in general.  Very sad story.  Clearly she didn't know how to deal with it and Russia sounds very repressive (more repressive than 5 years ago) right now.  
Avoid being scammed and read this [wiki about it](http://www.reddit.com/r/FifaUTCoins/wiki/avoidscammers). **DO NOT trade unless the person who wants to trade with you comments in this thread. Otherwise they are probably banned scammers no matter their excuse.**  *[I am a bot](/r/AutoModerator/comments/q11pu/what_is_automoderator/), and this action was performed automatically. Please [contact the moderators of this subreddit](/message/compose?to=%2Fr%2FFifaUTCoins) if you have any questions or concerns.*
*They* worded it. I'm merely relating what they worded.
I, Claudius by Robert Graves is very good. It gets a little dry sometimes but it's a great story.
They have always been an MRA haven - remember they act as if their Rapist founder is a saint and being wrongly prosecuted.
&gt;Berserker's "precognition" is just Eye of the Mind (False). That lets him decipher feints and tricks in battle, not tell when someone is trying to ventilate his master from 500 meters away.   funny because I recall the text explicitly saying it does just that  &gt;More importantly than any of that, being able to survive an Origin Round =/= being able to defeat Kiritsugu. Remember the dossier Kirei reads? "Sniping. Poisoning. Bombs in public places." The first mage we see Kiritsugu go up against, he blows up the building the man is standing in. That's what the masters would have to face. Not a man with a fancy gun.  But then I could tell you a story of Shinji winning the war and make it seem convincing. After all if Origin bullets aren't anything special then theres nothing stopping him from putting bombs in public places either.   Mundane means of attack surprise magi who think in terms magic duels. There aren't any in the fifth war besides Rin. Without the element of surprise even basic magic can make a bulk of these methods instantly useless. There's a reason everybody doesn't run around pulling the same tricks as Kiritsugu.   Of course you could come up with a scenario where a magus killer manages to single handedly take the war(hello Hollow Ataraxia). If you ignore Kuzuki and Caster and Zouken and Kirei (and Bazett for that matter)and ignore the fact that these are the people Shirou and Rin manage to beat and allow that said killer has perfect knowledge of the situation and luck and that origin bullets are just tiny nobel phantasms that work on everything magic instead of normal magic circuits being fired at full burst at them.  Provided you aren't dealing with any of the stuff in Heaven's Feel.
Poor little guy! I would assume he's either poked his eye on hay/bedding or got something caught in it. I hope the vet has good news for you tomorrow. 
I can't either.   I'm one degree shy of 10 here so I'm close.
I give this game over all about 7.5 (maybe 8/10 when I fully finish). There have been a couple errors, some similar to what happened when I played dead island. More so I couldn't help but shake this felt like a really pretty riptide with parkour.   The story while a step up to dead island, isn't really a great story when you compare it to another standard game however. Based on individual traits that make up this game is quite terrible, but combining everything actually mitigates and makes it better. The story to me never really blew me away though. 
I was a monster in my early teens. I would rage out over nothing, break things, I was unable to concentrate at school and moved schools several time due to poor academic performance and bad behaviour until my parents were barely able to cope being very young themselves and they finally look in to medical cannabis and put me in a montessori school, where I seemed to do better.  Cannabis did many things, it slowed me down, gave me introspection in to my behaviour, and seemed to balance my mood. It was like I was able to slow down, take a step back and see what a shit I was. The knock on effect of all this was that I was able to find motivation and I was far less susceptible to mood swings and outbursts.   As I said I'm now in my 2nd year of uni at Melbourne University. I feel that had I been put on traditional medications I may have wound up like a walking zombie and not been nearly as successful or happy as I am today. 
We're two wild and crazy guys! Haha
It had Wolf, he was best not clone.
Yes, I can see this definitely as a potential issue. But this works both ways: men can also want to protect themselves (hence my using a fake name). Just a few weeks ago a CL woman went ballistic on me for deciding I didn't want to go on a first date with her after all; she sent me some of the worst hate mail I've ever received.  As far as this particular woman, I wrote a great deal in my initial emails to her. I really think that anyone with an ounce of intuition would get that I not only mean no harm, but that I'm also rather harmless.
I  like being religious, it helps me a lot and given me a lot of motivation. I was Christian but ran into some issues with the person of Jesus Christ pbuh. While he is amazing, I didn't see him as God and I was aware of embellishments in the Gospels, and it caused me to have some doubts. Not that doubt is a bad thing, it matures faith. However, I experienced a lot of church hurt and I became so disingenuous and cynical about Christianity, that I decided it was no longer productive. In fact, I was a promiscuous coke-addict for a vast last  segment of my Christian walk. I was still worship leading, speaking in tongues (I was Pentecostal), serving in various positions of leadership, and reading my Bible, but it was no longer connecting. So, I ended up taking a break from my Ph.D. and moved back from LA to NYC to get my life together.  I looked into Abrahamic faiths that accept Jesus Christ pbuh, and read some books by Western scholars, have conversations with friends, and decided to practice Islam. Not that it's been skipping through tulips since then; I find some problems with Islam just like I had in Christianity. Sometimes, it feels like I have more problems with Islam. But the way I choose to practice it had helped me a lot. Maybe it's in my head or maybe it's God, I don't know. 
What size do you think would be a good size than? Cause I was also thinking about an empty 20lb propane tank. I think I've seen a build for that too
Haha, I can picture it. 
VAPECENTRIC!  20% off their already lower price, unsurpassed personal customer service AND faster than a speeding bullet shipping...
I have irritable bowel syndrome
Do not bring the eyeshadow up that high. At least not in the colour you're using, something a little more neutral underneath the brow would look better. Speaking of brows, I recommend filling them in, this is an essential step for bold looks.  Also, practice makes you perfect. Keep on blending. To prevent the colours from mixing and looking muddy, purchase a primer and perhaps an eyeshadow base.  Looks like you were going for a halo eye, meaning the brighter tone is in the middle of the lid and surrounded by a darker shade. Blending and usage of a primer are the most crucial steps to improve cleanliness.  Good luck and happy practicing.
Verdandi is the best leader for those team yo.
The only music I use from that is the music they play at the end of a round when it shows you who the MVP is (which is literally like 3-4 seconds before the round ends). Any other type of music in game and I can't hear any footsteps or other important information.
So what was it like?
I can lift 100 pounds over my head.
So after all these nerfs batrider is still able to have 60% winrate lol..
Any news for Rosalina around the Los Angeles Area? I've been contacting targets all day and asking them if they're going to be in stock at their store and the replies I get make me nervous:  "I hope it's in stock tomorrow..."  "I don't know, maybe"  "They might be"  If anyone knows any info about them, that'd be great! I'm going to stop by the Culver City Target first thing in the morning.
Man, quick work. This sub is so on top of being "too soon" that I very often have no idea what even happened and learn it from jokes here.
Do you think orcs just sit around waiting for orders from Sauron? They have some semblance of a society, one would have to assume, which includes taverns and that type of stuff. 
Aphex Twins new EP Computer Controlled Acoustic Instrumentals pt 2 is pretty dope. But that might be because it just came out and I can't stop listening to it. 
We do the same thing in America! We call it a "Snipe".
Randle looks like a great injury-prone guy
That's because we live in the Starbuck's age where we're taught that good coffee is over-roasted and then has it's remaining flavor buried under tons of milk and flavorings.  Gourmet coffee my a$$.
That tattoo would not fit on my entire back. 
Did you wank in the living room? 
It very likely can fit two people. My apartment is also that size and fits two people.
Not if that bare ass is sitting on my bare dick while laying on that cable car seat.
Overkill is the best way to ensure nothing gets past them. I mean, remember when I speed edited some of your one-shots? That was a mess and I apologize for not catching a lot of mistakes. :)
3491
rongupta, 32 hunter
No I live in Pennsylvania it was just something to hold me over and something you don't see often and well it's kind of fun
I took your advice and started looking at a charcoal paint. The pictures online look pretty fantastic, but there are so many different tones.   I'm thinking a darker shade because then it wouldn't blend in with the cabinets. But not so dark it's black. Am I along the right line of thinking?  Sorry for the questions, I'm still just a beginner with all this!
My comment is pretty old but nobody was raped in that scene.
I guess you haven't played a Yakuza game
When a correction happens deflation is part of the natural clearing out process.   &gt; Most people consider firing people a worse social outcome than cutting wages  Yes, but when governments dictate a minimum wage this cannot be an option. People therefore lose their jobs.  &gt; So an inflationary environment might be preferable to a deflationary one for this reason.   Preferable to who? To an uncompetitive business? To a business loaded with debt? To a government that wants to inflate its debt away instead of actually cutting spending like it should?  America didn't become the greatest economy in the world during inflationary times. It built its economy during the 18th and 19th centuries which were overall deflationary periods of great growth and falling prices. It wasn't until the 20th century that this idea of inflating became de rigour, and that was because governments needed to finance their welfare systems without taxing their citizens to death, and now it's all coming home to roost.  Governments love inflation because it means they can spend the wealth of the unborn.  &gt; though most would agree that there are better ways to reduce poverty.  Such as creating real growth instead of trying to artificially stimulate it with low interest rates and QE (I haven't read those links. Later).
About every third. I have yet to see Tom Hanks make it though, although sometimes he comes close.
The media caught wind of it months ago, but the picture he posted is super cute. 
Good, you?
Did you take this photo?
We don't really know. The EPA is conducting a long term study to determine the environmental impacts of fracking. Until that study is done, we can only speculate by looking at smaller scale studies done by other groups.  Some notable possibilities:  1) Pollution of ground water through improperly disposal processes  2) Earthquakes from altering the geology of the area around the well  3) Increased global warming from increased availability of fossil fuels
Talk was moved to 5PM so if you are here or couldn't make 3:30 see you soon!
OP is being a keyboard warrior too. Is your issue with me the fact that I'm a keyboard warrior or that I'm a keyboard warrior who disagrees with you?
#LET'S NOT
Thank goodness that this shop is so sweet as it's the only one close to me. The next closest is about an hour and a half away. There is a shop that's supposed to be reopening but I haven't heard great things about them
